CIK: 1180145
Company Name: CARDIOVASCULAR SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2011-09-12
Accession Number: 0001193125-11-245825


Item 1 Business. Special Note Regarding Forward Looking Statements This report contains plans, intentions, objectives, estimates and expectations that constitute forward looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act ), which are subject to the safe harbor created by those sections. Forward looking statements are based on our management beliefs and assumptions and on information currently available to our management. In some cases, you can identify forward looking statements by terms such as may, will, should, could, would, expect, plans, anticipates, believes, estimates, projects, predicts, potential and similar expressions intended to identify forward looking statements. Examples of these statements include, but are not limited to, any statements regarding our future financial performance, results of operations or sufficiency of capital resources to fund our operating requirements, and other statements that are other than statements of historical fact. Our actual results could differ materially from those discussed in these forward looking statements due to a number of factors, including the risks and uncertainties are described more fully by us in , Item 1A and I, Item 7 of this report and in our other filings with the SEC. You should not place undue reliance on these forward looking statements, which apply only as of the date of this report. You should read this report completely and with the understanding that our actual future results may be materially different from what we expect. Except as required by law, we assume no obligation to update these forward looking statements publicly, or to update the reasons actual results could differ materially from those anticipated in these forward looking statements, even if new information becomes available in the future. Corporate Information We were incorporated as Replidyne, Inc. in Delaware in 2000. On February 25, 2009, Replidyne, Inc. completed its business combination with Cardiovascular Systems, Inc., a Minnesota corporation ( CSI MN ), in accordance with the terms of the Agreement and Plan of Merger and Reorganization, dated as of November 3, 2008, by and among Replidyne, Responder Merger Sub, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Replidyne ( Merger Sub ), and CSI MN (the Merger Agreement ). Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, Merger Sub merged with and into CSI MN, with CSI MN continuing after the merger as the surviving corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Replidyne. At the effective time of the merger, Replidyne changed its name to Cardiovascular Systems, Inc. ( CSI ) and CSI MN changed its name to CSI Minnesota, Inc. As of immediately following the effective time of the merger, former CSI MN stockholders owned approximately 80.2% of the outstanding common stock of the combined company, and Replidyne stockholders owned approximately 19.8% of the outstanding common stock of the combined company. Following the merger of Merger Sub with CSI MN, CSI MN merged with and into CSI, with CSI continuing after the merger as the surviving corporation. These transactions are referred to herein as the merger. Unless the context otherwise requires, all references herein to the Company, CSI, we, us and our refer to CSI MN prior to the completion of the merger and to CSI following the completion of the merger and the name change, and all references to Replidyne refer to Replidyne prior to the completion of the merger and the name change. Replidyne was a biopharmaceutical company focused on discovering, developing, in licensing and commercializing anti infective products. CSI MN was incorporated in Minnesota in 1989. From 1989 to 1997, we engaged in research and development on several different product concepts that were later aband1d. Since 1997, we have devoted substantially all of our resources to the development of the PAD Systems (as hereafter defined) and our Viper line of ancillary products. Our principal executive office is located at 651 Campus Drive, St. Paul, Minnesota 55112 Our teleph1 number is (651) 259 1600, and our website is www.csi360.com. The information contained in or accessible through our website is not incorporated by reference into, and should not be considered part of, this Annual Report on Form 10 K. 1 Table of Contents We have received federal registration in the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, or USPTO, of certain marks including Diamondback 360 , CSI , a first CSI logo, a second CSI logo, Lumen Library , ViperWire , ViperWire Advance , Viperslide , ViperTrack , and ViperCaddy. We have applied for federal registration with the USPTO of certain marks, including Predator 360 , Stealth 360 , Attack the Plaque. Preserve the Media and Change Compliance First. All other trademarks, trade names and service marks appearing in this Form 10 K are the property of their respective owners. Business Overview We are a medical device company focused on developing and commercializing minimally invasive treatment solutions for vascular disease. Interventional endovascular treatment of peripheral artery disease, or PAD, is our initial area of focus. PAD is caused by the accumulation of plaque in peripheral arteries, most commonly occurring in the pelvis and legs. PAD is a progressive disease, and, if left untreated, can lead to limb amputation or death. Our primary products, the Diamondback 360 PAD System ( Diamondback 360 ), Diamondback Predator 360 PAD System ( Predator 360 ) and Stealth 360 PAD System ( Stealth 360 ), are catheter based platforms capable of treating a broad range of plaque types in leg arteries both above and below the knee and address many of the limitations associated with existing treatment alternatives. We refer to the Diamondback 360 , the Predator 360 and the Stealth 360 collectively in this Annual Report on Form 10 K as the PAD Systems. In August 2007, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, granted us 510(k) clearance for the use of the Diamondback 360 as a therapy in patients with PAD. We commenced a limited commercial introduction of the Diamondback 360 in the United States in September 2007 and began a full commercial launch during the quarter ended March 31, 2008. We received 510(k) clearance of the Predator 360 in March 2009 and commenced commercial launch in April 2009. We received 510(k) clearance of the Stealth 360 in March 2011 and commenced a limited market release that same month. We expect to continue this limited release through the first quarter of fiscal 2012, ending September 30, 2011, after which we plan to begin a broader commercial launch. As of June 30, 2011, the PAD Systems had been utilized in more than 50,000 procedures. We intend to leverage the capabilities of the PAD Systems to expand into the interventional coronary market though we need to complete certain clinical trials and receive FDA approval to do so. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. In addition to the PAD Systems, we are expanding our product portfolio through internal product development and establishment of business relationships with other medical device companies. We now offer multiple accessory products designed to complement the use of the PAD Systems, and we have entered into a distribution agreement with Asahi Intecc Co., Ltd. to market its peripheral guidewire line in the United States. Market Overview Peripheral Artery Disease PAD is a circulatory problem in which plaque deposits build up on the walls of the arteries, reducing blood flow to the limbs. The most common early symptoms of PAD are pain, cramping or fatigue in the leg or hip muscles while walking. Symptoms may progress to include numbness, tingling or weakness in the leg and, in severe cases, burning or aching pain in the leg, foot or toes while resting. As PAD progresses, additional signs and symptoms occur, including cooling or color changes in the skin of the legs or feet, and sores on the legs or feet that do not heal. If untreated, PAD may lead to critical limb ischemia, a condition in which the amount of oxygenated blood being delivered to the limb is insufficient to keep the tissue alive. Critical limb ischemia often leads to large non healing ulcers, infections, gangrene and, eventually, limb amputation or death. PAD affects approximately eight to 12 million people in the United States, as cited by the authors of the PARTNERS study published in the Journal of the American Medical Association in 2001 According to 2007 statistics from the American Heart Association, PAD becomes more common with age and affects approximately 2 Table of Contents 12% to 20% of the population over 65 years old. An aging population, coupled with increasing incidence of diabetes and obesity, is likely to increase the prevalence of PAD. In many older PAD patients, particularly those with diabetes, PAD is characterized by fibrotic (moderately hard) or calcified (extremely hard) plaque deposits that have not been successfully treated with existing non invasive treatment techniques. PAD may involve arteries throughout the leg. Arteries above the knee are generally long, straight and relatively wide, while arteries below the knee are shorter and branch into arteries that are progressively smaller in diameter. Despite the severity of PAD, it remains relatively underdiagnosed. According to an article published in Podiatry Today in 2006, only approximately 25 million of the eight to 12 million people in the United States with PAD are diagnosed. Although we believe the rate of diagnosis of PAD is increasing, underdiagnosis continues due to patients failing to display symptoms or physicians misinterpreting symptoms as normal aging. Recent emphasis on PAD education from medical associations, insurance companies and other groups, coupled with publications in medical journals, is increasing physician and patient awareness of PAD risk factors, symptoms and treatment options. The PARTNERS study advocated increased PAD screening by primary care physicians. Physicians treat a significant portion of the 25 million people in the United States who are diagnosed with PAD using medical management, which includes lifestyle changes, such as diet and exercise and drug treatment. For instance, within a reference group of more than 1,000 patients from the PARTNERS study, 54% of the patients with a prior diagnosis of PAD were receiving antiplatelet medication treatment. While medications, diet and exercise may improve blood flow, they do not treat the underlying obstruction and many patients have difficulty maintaining lifestyle changes. Additionally, many prescribed medications are contraindicated, or inadvisable, for patients with heart disease, which often exists in PAD patients. As a result of these challenges, many medically managed patients develop more severe symptoms that require procedural intervention. Coronary Artery Disease Based on data from the U.S. Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, or AHRQ, and the U.S. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, we estimate that approximately 924,000 percutaneous coronary interventions, or PCI, procedures occurred in the United States in 2009. Based on various studies, we believe that more than 25% of PCI procedures involve moderate to severe levels of calcified coronary arteries and could benefit from the use of our device. In addition, based on AHRQ data, we estimate that in 2009 approximately 478,000 coronary artery bypass graft surgeries were performed in the United States. These patients generally have higher rates of calcification and we believe they could benefit from the use of our device. Our Product Comp1nts of the PAD Systems The PAD Systems each use a single use, low profile catheter that travels over our proprietary ViperWire Advance Guide Wire and is powered by either an external control unit (Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 ) or a saline infusion pump (Stealth 360 ). Catheter. The catheter consists of a control handle, which allows precise movement of the crown and predictable crown location; a flexible drive shaft with a diamond grit coated offset crown, which tracks and orbits over the guidewire; and a sheath, which covers the drive shaft and permits delivery of saline or medications to the treatment area. ViperWire Advance Guidewire. The ViperWire Advance is the second generation of the ViperWire. The ViperWire Advance was designed to offer an improved ability to maneuver through tortuous, twisting blood vessels and cross challenging lesions. The PAD Systems travel over this wire to the lesion and operate on this wire. 3 Table of Contents ViperSlide Lubricant. ViperSlide is an exclusive lubricant designed to optimize the smooth operation of the PAD Systems. On April 4, 2011, we entered into a five year supply agreement with Fresenius Kabi AB ( Fresenius ), pursuant to which Fresenius will manufacture and serve as a single source supplier of the ViperSlide lubricant through March 2016. Control Unit. Used in conjunction with the Diamondback 360 and Predator 360 PAD Systems, the control unit incorporates a touch screen interface on an easily maneuverable, lightweight pole. Using an external air supply, the control unit regulates air pressure to drive the turbine located in the catheter handle to speeds ranging up to 200,000 revolutions per minute. Saline, delivered by a pumping mechanism on the control unit, bathes the device shaft and crown. The constant flow of saline reduces the risk of heat generation. Saline Infusion Pump. Used exclusively with the Stealth 360 , the saline infusion pump mounts directly to the intravenous pole and bathes the devices shaft and crown and provides a power supply for the operation of the catheter. Technology Overview The 2 technologies used in the PAD Systems are plaque modification through differential sanding and plaque removal. Plaque Modification through Differential Sanding. The PAD Systems were designed to allow the devices to differentiate between soft compliant and harder diseased arterial tissue. This property is consistent with sanding material such as the diamond grit used in the PAD Systems. The diamond preferentially engages and sands harder material. The PAD Systems also treat soft plaque, which is still harder than a normal vessel wall. Arterial lesions tend to be harder and stiffer than compliant, undiseased tissue, and they often are fibrotic or calcified. The PAD Systems sand the lesion but are designed not to damage more compliant parts of the artery. The mechanism is a function of the centrifugal force generated by the PAD Systems as they rotate. As the crown moves outward, the centrifugal force is offset by the counterforce exerted by the arterial wall. If the tissue is compliant, it should flex away, rather than generating an opposing force that would allow the PAD Systems to engage and sand the wall. Diseased tissue provides resistance and is able to generate an opposing force that allows the PAD Systems to engage and sand the plaque. The sanded plaque is broken down into particles generally smaller than circulating red blood cells that are washed away downstream with the patient natural blood flow. Of 36 consecutive experiments that we performed in carbon blocks, animal and cadaver models 931% of particles were smaller than a red blood cell, with a 99% confidence interval; and 99.3% of particles were smaller than the lumen of the capillaries (which provide the connection between the arterial and venous system), with a 99% confidence interval. The small particle size minimizes the risk of vascular bed overload, or a saturation of the peripheral vessels with large particles, which may cause slow or reduced blood flow to the foot. We believe that the small size of the particles also allows them to be managed by the body natural cleansing of the blood, whereby various types of white blood cells eliminate worn out cells and other debris in the bloodstream. Plaque Removal. The systems operate on the principles of centrifugal force. As the speed of the crown rotation increases, it creates centrifugal force, which increases the crown orbit and presses the diamond grit coated offset crown against the lesion or plaque, removing a small amount of plaque with each orbit. Normal arteries are compliant; they have the ability to expand and contract as needed to supply blood flow to the legs and feet. Arteries burdened with fibrotic (moderately hard) and or calcified (extremely hard) plaque often lose their compliance, which makes other therapies such as angioplasty, stenting, surgical bypass and atherectomy problematic. The characteristics of the orbit and the resulting lumen size can be adjusted by modifying 3 variables Speed. An increase in speed creates a larger lumen. Our current systems allow the user to choose between 3 rotational speeds. Crown Characteristics. The crown can be designed with various weights (as determined by different materials and density) and coated with diamond grit of various width, height and configurations. The 4 Table of Contents Diamondback 360 crown is available in 2 configurations classic and solid. Crown sizes and configurations are selected based on several case criteria, including reference vessel size, length and degree of stenosis, and anatomy tortuosity. The Predator 360 crown is available in the solid configuration and is constructed to allow the crown to engage and treat the lesion more efficiently, which can result in shorter procedure times. Both the classic and Predator 360 crowns are available in multiple sizes, including 125, 150, 175, 200 millimeter. There is also a 225 millimeter diameter in the Predator 360 crown configuration. Currently, the Stealth 360 device is available with a 150 millimeter classic crown, and 125 millimeter and 200 millimeter Predator 360 crown configuration. For both configurations, the catheter length is 145 centimeters, which addresses procedural approach and target lesion locations both above and below the knee. Drive Shaft Characteristics. The drive shaft can be designed with various shapes and degrees of rigidity. The drive shaft on the Stealth 360 device with a Predator 360 crown configuration is newly developed, enhancing the ability to advance the device more smoothly and effectively through tortuous anatomy and challenging lesion morphologies, thereby improving the overall efficiency of the device. We view the PAD Systems as platforms that can be used to develop additional products by adjusting 1 or more of the speed, crown and shaft variables. Applications The PAD Systems can be used to treat plaque in multiple anatomic locations. Below the Knee and Behind the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Arteries below and behind the knee have small diameters and may be diffusely diseased, calcified or both, limiting the effectiveness of traditional devices. Behind the knee lesions also present challenges if a stent is required because stents frequently fracture due to the forces exerted on the vessels when the knee bends or flexes. The PAD Systems are effective in both diffused and calcified vessels. This was demonstrated in the OASIS trial, where 94.5% of lesions treated with the Diamondback 360 were behind or below the knee. Above the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Plaque in arteries above the knee may also be diffuse, fibrotic and calcific; however, these arteries are longer, straighter and wider than below the knee vessels. While effective in difficult to treat below the knee vessels, and indicated for vessels up to four millimeters in diameter, our products are also being used to treat lesions above the knee. Coronary Artery Disease. Given the many similarities between peripheral and coronary artery disease, we have developed a modified version of the Diamondback 360 to treat coronary arteries. We have conducted numerous bench studies, pre clinical animal studies, and our ORBIT I 50 patient human clinical study to evaluate the Diamondback 360 in coronary artery disease. A coronary application requires us to conduct a clinical trial and file a premarket application (PMA) and obtain approval from the FDA. We participated in 3 pre investigational device exemption, or IDE, meetings with the FDA and completed the human feasibility portion of a coronary trial in the summer of 2008 in India, enrolling 50 patients. The FDA agreed to accept the data from the India trial to support an IDE submission. The FDA granted unconditional approval in April 2010 to begin the ORBIT II coronary study in the United States. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. Our Solution The PAD Systems represent an innovative approach to the treatment of PAD that provides physicians and patients with a procedure that addresses many of the limitations of traditional treatment alternatives. The PAD Systems each use single use catheters that incorporate a flexible drive shaft with an offset diamond grit coated crown. Physicians position the crown at the site of an arterial plaque containing lesion and remove the plaque by positioning the crown to orbit against it, creating a smooth lumen, or channel, in the vessel. The PAD Systems are designed to differentiate between hard plaque and soft, compliant arterial tissue, a concept that we refer to as differential sanding. 5 Table of Contents Normal arteries are compliant; they have the ability to expand and contract as needed to supply blood flow to the legs and feet. Arteries burdened with fibrotic (moderately hard) and or calcified (extremely hard) plaque due to PAD lose their compliance which makes other therapies such as angioplasty, stenting, surgical bypass and atherectomy problematic. The PAD Systems sand plaque into small particles and restore both blood flow and vessel compliance. The particles created by the PAD Systems are generally smaller than red blood cells and are carried away by the bloodstream. The small size of the particles avoids the need for plaque collection reservoirs. The PAD Systems can typically treat the diseased arteries with less than 2 to 3 minutes of sanding time, potentially reducing the overall procedure time. We believe that the PAD Systems offer the following key benefits Strong Safety Profile Differential Sanding Reduces Risk of Adverse Events. The PAD Systems are designed to differentiate between hard plaque and soft compliant arterial tissue. Arteries are composed of 3 tissue layers. The diamond grit coated offset crown at the working end of the devices engages and removes plaque from the artery wall with minimal likelihood of penetrating or damaging the fragile, inner layer of the arterial wall because soft, compliant tissue flexes away from the crown. Furthermore, the PAD Systems have rarely penetrated even the middle or outer layers of the artery wall. The Diamondback 360 perforation rate was 24% during our pivotal OASIS trial. Analysis by an independent pathology laboratory of more than 434 consecutive cross sections of porcine arteries treated with the Diamondback 360 revealed there was minimal to no damage, on average, to the middle layer, which is typically associated with restenosis. In addition, the safety profile of the Diamondback 360 was found to be non inferior to that of angioplasty, which is often considered the safest of interventional methods. This was demonstrated in our OASIS trial, which had a low 4.8% rate of device related serious adverse events, or SAEs. Reduces the Risk of Distal Embolization. The PAD Systems sand plaque away from artery walls in a manner that produces particles of such a small size generally smaller than red blood cells that they are carried away by the bloodstream. The small size of the particles avoids the need for plaque collection reservoirs on the catheter and reduces the need for ancillary distal protection devices, commonly used with directional cutting atherectomy, and also significantly reduces the risk that larger pieces of removed plaque will block blood flow downstream. Allows Continuous Blood Flow During Procedure. The PAD Systems allow for continuous blood flow during the procedure, except when used in chronic total occlusions. Other devices may restrict blood flow due to the size of the catheter required or the use of distal protection devices, which could result in complications such as excessive heat and tissue damage. Proven Efficacy Efficacy Demonstrated in a 124 Patient Clinical Trial. Our pivotal OASIS clinical trial was a prospective 20 center study that involved 124 patients with 201 lesions treated by the Diamondback 360 . Performance targets were established cooperatively with the FDA before the trial began. Despite 55% of the lesions consisting of calcified plaque and 48% of the lesions having a length greater than 3 centimeters, the performance of the Diamondback 360 in the OASIS trial successfully met the FDA study endpoints. Because the Predator 360 and Stealth 360 mechanism of action is identical to that of the Diamondback 360 , no additional efficacy trials were required by the FDA for 510(k) clearance of either PAD System. Treats Difficult, Fibrotic and Calcified Lesions. The PAD Systems enable physicians to remove plaque from long, fibrotic, calcified or bifurcated lesions in peripheral arteries both above and below the knee. Other PAD devices have demonstrated limited effectiveness in treating these challenging lesions. Orbital Motion Improves Device to Lumen Ratio. The orbiting action of the PAD Systems can create a lumen of approximately 20 times the diameter of the crown. The variable device to lumen ratio allows the continuous removal of plaque as the opening of the lumen increases during the operation of the 6 Table of Contents devices. Non orbiting rotational atherectomy catheters remove plaque by abrading the lesion with a spinning, abrasive burr, which acts in a manner similar to a drill and only creates a lumen the same size or slightly smaller than the size of the burr. Differential Sanding Creates Smooth Lumens. The differential sanding of the PAD Systems creates a smooth surface inside the lumen. We believe that the smooth lumens created by the devices increase the velocity of blood flow and decrease the resistance to blood flow, which may decrease potential for restenosis, or renarrowing of the arteries. Ease of Use Utilizes Familiar Techniques. Physicians using the PAD Systems employ techniques similar to those used in angioplasty, which are familiar to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists who are trained in endovascular techniques. The devices simple user interfaces require minimal additional training. The devices ability to differentiate between diseased and compliant tissue reduces the risk of complications associated with user error and potentially broadens the user population. Single Insertion to Complete Treatment. The orbital technology and differential sanding process of the PAD Systems allows for a single insertion to treat lesions, in most cases. Because the particles of plaque sanded away are of such small sizes, the PAD Systems do not require a collection reservoir that needs to be repeatedly emptied or cleaned during the procedure. Rather, the PAD Systems allow for multiple passes of the device over the lesion until plaque is removed and a smooth lumen is created. Limited Use of Fluoroscopy. The relative simplicity of our process and predictable crown location allows physicians to significantly reduce fluoroscopy use, thus limiting radiation exposure. Treatment Area Treats Entire Leg. The PAD Systems have the ability to treat the entire leg, including small vessels below the knee. Cost and Time Efficient Procedure Short Procedure Time. The PAD Systems have a short treatment time. Treatment with the Diamondback 360 typically ranges from 3 to four minutes, while treatment time with the Predator 360 and Stealth 360 is typically shorter ranging from 90 seconds to 3 minutes. Single Crown Can Create Various Lumen Sizes Limiting Hospital Inventory Costs. The orbital mechanism of action with the PAD Systems allows a single sized device to create various diameter lumens inside the artery. Adjusting the rotational speed of the crown changes the orbit to create the desired lumen diameter, thereby potentially avoiding the need to use multiple catheters of different sizes to treat multiple lesions. The PAD Systems can create a lumen that is 100% larger than the actual diameter of the device, for a device to lumen ratio of approximately 10 to 20. Single Insertion Reduces Procedural Time. Since the physician does not need to insert and remove multiple catheters or clean a plaque collection reservoir to complete the procedure, there is a potential for decreased procedure time. Our Strategy Our goal is to be the leading provider of minimally invasive solutions for the treatment of vascular disease. The key elements of our strategy include Drive Adoption Through Our Direct Sales Organization and Key Physician Leaders. We expect to continue to drive adoption of the PAD Systems through our direct sales force, which targets interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists. As a key element of our strategy, we 7 Table of Contents focus on educating and training physicians on the PAD Systems through our direct sales force and during seminars where physician industry leaders discuss case studies and treatment techniques using the devices. Collect Additional Clinical Evidence on Benefits of the PAD Systems. Physicians are increasingly requesting clinical study evidence to allow them to make the best treatment decisions to achieve the best possible short term and long term outcomes for their patients. We are focused on collecting and using clinical evidence to demonstrate the advantages of the PAD Systems and drive physician acceptance. Expand Product Portfolio within the Market for Treatment of Peripheral Arteries. In addition to the PAD Systems, we are expanding our product portfolio. We now offer multiple accessory devices designed to complement the use of the PAD Systems. We continue to market the following products ViperSlide Lubricant an exclusive lubricant designed to optimize the smooth operation of the PAD Systems ViperTrack Radiopaque Tape a radiopaque tape to assist in measuring lesion lengths and marking lesion locations ViperWire Advance guidewire offering improved ability to maneuver through tortuous, twisting blood vessels and cross challenging lesions We are continuing to evaluate internal product development to further expand our portfolio of PAD treatment solutions. Leverage Technology Platform into Coronary Market. Based on the clinical performance of the PAD Systems in treating lower extremity PAD, we intend to leverage the devices capabilities to expand into the interventional coronary market. A coronary application would address a large market opportunity, further leveraging our core technology and expanding its market potential. In 2008, we completed the ORBIT I trial, a 50 patient study in India that investigated the safety of the Diamondback 360 device in treating calcified coronary artery lesions. Results successfully met both safety and efficacy endpoints. An IDE application has been approved by the FDA for ORBIT II, a pivotal 429 patient trial in the United States to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of the Diamondback 360 in treating severely calcified coronary lesions. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrolment of the 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial, which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. Pursue Strategic Acquisitions and Partnerships. In August 2009, we signed an exclusive distribution agreement with Asahi Intecc, Ltd. ( Asahi ) to market its peripheral guidewire line in the United States. We offer 2 Asahi 0.18 wire platforms the Astato 30 and Treasure 12 The Astato 30 is a high penetration guide wire specially designed to break through fibrous caps and calcium deposits, and treat long, complex lesions. The Treasure 12 has a 1 piece core to provide control, torque performance and tactile feedback to the physician. In addition to adding to our product portfolio through internal development efforts, we intend to continue to explore the acquisition of other product lines, technologies or companies that may leverage our sales force or complement our strategic objectives. We plan to continue to evaluate distribution agreements, licensing transactions, other strategic partnerships, and the financial viability of marketing the PAD Systems internationally. Clinical Trials and Studies for Our Products We are committed to providing relevant clinical evidence to allow physicians to select and utilize the best treatment options for their patients. We have conducted twelve clinical trials to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the PAD Systems in treating PAD, enrolling a total of 3,746 patients in our PAD I and PAD II pilot trials, OASIS pivotal trial, OASIS LT study demonstrating long term durability of the Diamondback 360 and the CONFIRM DIAMONDBACK, CONFIRM PREDATOR and CONFIRM OUTFLOW Post Market Registries. In 8 Table of Contents addition, we have also completed enrollment in the CALCIUM 360 and COMPLIANCE 360 post market, randomized feasibility studies that further differentiate the performance of the Diamondback 360 and Predator 360 from conventional balloon angioplasty. To demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the Diamondback 360 for use in coronary arteries we also completed the ORBIT I coronary clinical trial in India in 2009. In 2010, we began the ORBIT II pivotal study in the United States, evaluating the use of the Diamondback 360 in coronary arteries. Metrics Used in PAD Trials The common metrics used to evaluate plaque modification and removal devices for PAD include Metric Description Change in Compliance Compliance change as defined in the COMPLIANCE 360 protocol is to achieve 30% residual stenosis with orbital atherectomy followed by a low pressure balloon inflation of 4 atmospheres pressure (atm). Absolute Plaque Reduction Absolute plaque reduction is the difference between the pre treatment percent stenosis, or the narrowing of the vessel and the post treatment percent stenosis as measured angiographically. Target Lesion Revascularization Target lesion revascularization rate, or TLR rate, is the percentage of patients at follow up who have underg1 another peripheral intervention in the same lesion due to their worsening symptoms. Treatments such as an angioplasty, stenting or surgery may be used to reopen the treated lesion site. Ankle Brachial Index The Ankle Brachial Index, or ABI, is a measurement that is useful to evaluate the adequacy of circulation in the legs and improvement or worsening of leg circulation over time. The ABI is a ratio between the blood pressure in a patient ankle and a patient arm, with a ratio above 0.9 being normal. The common metrics used to evaluate atherectomy devices for PAD include Metric Description Serious Adverse Events SAEs include any experience that is fatal or life threatening, is permanently disabling, requires or prolongs hospitalization, or requires intervention to prevent permanent impairment or damage. SAEs may or may not be related to the device. Perforations Perforations occur when the artery is punctured during atherectomy treatment. Perforations may be nonserious or serious (referred to as an SAE) depending on the treatment required to repair the perforation. Inclusion criteria for trials often limit size of lesion and severity of disease, as measured by the Rutherford Class, which utilizes a scale of I to VI, with I being mild and VI being most severe, and the ABI. PAD Feasibility Trials The first clinical trial was a 2 site, 17 patient feasibility clinical trial in Europe, referred to as PAD I, which began in March 2005. Patients enrolled in the trial had lesions that were less than 10 cm in length in 9 Table of Contents arteries between 15 mm and 6.0 mm in diameter, with Rutherford Class scores of IV or lower. Patients were evaluated at the time of the procedure and at 30 days following treatment. The purpose of PAD I was to obtain the first human clinical experience and evaluate the safety of the Diamondback 360 . This was determined by estimating the cumulative incidence of patients experiencing 1 or more SAEs within 30 days post treatment. The results of PAD I confirmed that the Diamondback 360 was safe and established that the Diamondback 360 could be used to treat vessels in the range of 15 mm to 4.0 mm, which are found primarily below the knee. PAD I also showed that removal of plaque could be accomplished and the resulting device to lumen ratio was approximately 10 to 20. The SAE rate in PAD I was 6% (1 of 17 patients). After being granted the CE Mark in May 2005, a 66 patient European clinical trial, PAD II, was initiated at seven sites, in August 2005. All patients had stenosis in vessels below the femoral artery of between 15 mm and 4.0 mm in diameter, with at least 50% blockage. The primary objectives of this study were to evaluate the acute (30 days or less) risk of experiencing an SAE post procedure and provide evidence of device effectiveness. Effectiveness was confirmed angiographically and based on the percentage of absolute plaque reduction. The PAD II results demonstrated safe and effective debulking in vessels with diameters ranging from 15 mm to 4.0 mm with a mean absolute plaque reduction of 55%. The SAE rate in PAD II was 9% (six of 66 patients), which did not differ significantly from existing non invasive treatment options. OASIS Pivotal Trial An IDE was approved in September 2005 to begin our pivotal United States trial, OASIS. OASIS was a 124 patient, 20 center, prospective trial that began enrollment in January 2006. Patients included in the trial had An ABI of less than 0.9; A Rutherford Class score of V or lower; and Treated arteries of between 15 mm and 4.0 mm or less in diameter via angiogram measurement, with a well defined lesion of at least 50% diameter stenosis and lesions of no greater than 10.0 cm in length. The primary efficacy study endpoint was absolute plaque reduction of the target lesions from baseline to immediately post procedure. The primary safety endpoint was the cumulative incidence of SAEs at 30 days. In the OASIS trial, 94.5% of lesions treated were behind or below the knee, an area where lesions have traditionally g1 untreated until they require bypass surgery or amputation. Of the lesions treated in OASIS, 55% were comprised of calcified plaque, which presents a challenge to proper expansion and apposition of balloons and stents, and 48% were diffuse, or greater than 3 cm in length, which typically requires multiple balloon expansions or stent placements. Competing plaque removal devices are often ineffective with these difficult to treat lesions. The average time of treatment in the OASIS trial was 3 minutes per lesion, which compares favorably to the treatment time required by other plaque removal devices. The following table is a summary of the OASIS trial results Item Item FDA Target OASIS Result Absolute Plaque Reduction 55% 59.4% SAEs at 30 days 8%, with an upper bound of 16% 4.8%, device related; 9.7%, overall TLR 20% or less 24% Perforations N A 1 serious perforation ABI at baseline N A 0.68 0.2 ABI at 30 days N A 0.9 0.18 ABI at 6 months N A 0.83 0.23 Mean Standard Deviation 10 Table of Contents CLEAR 360 Study We conducted the CLEAR 360 study to evaluate the incidence of clinically significant hemolysis associated with orbital atherectomy used to treat severe peripheral arterial disease. This study enrolled 31 patients at four U.S. medical centers and was completed in 2009. This trial concluded that there was no clinically significant hemolysis after orbital atherectomy. OASIS Long Term Study In 2009 we completed a retrospective study evaluating the long term results of 64 patients from the pivotal OASIS trial. Outcomes were analyzed out to a mean of 29 months and include limb salvage rate, TLR rate and ABI. TLR, or reintervention in the originally treated lesion, was 136%. A 100% limb salvage rate was maintained. ABI scores remained significantly improved. This 29 month data of OASIS patients adds to our confidence in the safety and efficacy of the Diamondback 360 . Post Market Feasibility Studies In May 2010, enrollment was completed in the COMPLIANCE 360 clinical trial, the first of 2 PAD post market studies initiated in calendar 2009. This prospective, randomized, multi center study evaluated the clinical and economic benefits of modifying plaque to change large vessel compliance above the knee with the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 . The study compared the performance of the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 , plus low pressure balloon inflation, if desired, with that of high pressure balloon inflation al1 Fifty patients were enrolled at nine U.S. medical centers. The results of this trial showed that the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 can achieve superior results in treating calcified plaque by improving lesion compliance through differential sanding, without the need for stent placement. Trial results with a p value of less than 0.0001 statistically demonstrated the success rate in the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 arm of the trial had a procedural success rate of 360% greater than in the balloon arm of the trial and required 91% less bailout stenting. The six month study results will be presented as an oral presentation at the Transcatheter Cardiovascular Therapeutics, or TCT, conference in November 2011 in San Francisco, CA. Patients will complete their 12 month follow up by the end of September 2011 Twenty four months of data will continue to be collected. In April 2010, enrollment was completed in the CALCIUM 360 study, a prospective, randomized, multi center study comparing the effectiveness of the Diamondback 360 and Predator 360 to balloon angioplasty in treating calcified lesions below the knee. Calcified plaque exists in about 75 percent of lesions below the knee. Fifty patients were enrolled at eight U.S. medical centers. Six month results showed orbital treatment outperformed balloon angioplasty. A key finding was that by modifying calcified lesions first, the Diamondback 360 and Predator 360 allow use of a lower pressure adjunctive balloon therapy, reducing the need for bailout stenting with anticipated improved longer term patient outcomes. Orbital treatment outperformed balloon angioplasty on the primary endpoint of device success (less than or equal to 30% restenosis with no dissection C F) with 926% in the Diamondback 360 and Predator 360 arm of the trial versus 78.8% in the balloon arm of the trial. These results will be reported as an abstract at the San Francisco TCT conference. Patients will complete their 12 month follow up by the end of September 2011 Twenty four months of data will continue to be collected. CONFIRM Post Market Clinical Registry Series We are conducting the CONFIRM Post Market Clinical Registry Series, which will further evaluate acute and economic parameters related to the use of the PAD Systems. The CONFIRM Series currently consists of 3 registries CONFIRM I DIAMONDBACK, CONFIRM II PREDATOR, and CONFIRM III OUTFLOW. Enrollment of 728 patients in the CONFIRM I DIAMONDBACK Post Market Registry was completed in March 2010. In this prospective registry, 1,138 lesions were treated by 84 investigators at 57 medical centers with the Diamondback 360 . Patient characteristics were as follows 816% were smokers, 60.0% were diabetic, and 89.7% had hypertension. Lesions treated were above the knee (46.5%), behind the knee (17.5%), and below the knee (36.0%). Lesions were long and calcified. Lesions were treated with the Diamondback 360 followed by 11 Table of Contents low pressure balloon angioplasty, if desired. An average residual stenosis of 10.5% was achieved following treatment, which is consistent with that, achieved in PAD I, PAD II, and OASIS. Bail out stenting, or stenting required due to tears in the vessel wall, occurred in 22% of lesions, which is also consistent with the 25% reported in OASIS. This is lower than the 35% to 40% bail out stent rate reported in the literature for patients treated with high pressure balloon angioplasty al1 in this type of challenging patient population. Enrollment of 1,145 patients in the prospective CONFIRM II PREDATOR Post Market Registry was completed December 2010. The CONFIRM II PREDATOR evaluated clinical performance of the Predator 360 . Data on acute clinical performance and short term economic parameters were collected during this study. An abstract will be presented at the San Francisco TCT conference. Data from CONFIRM DIAMONDBACK and PREDATOR registries were used to design the CONFIRM III OUTFLOW registry. This is the third study in the CONFIRM series to further evaluate acute procedural outcomes and economic parameters associated with use of the PAD Systems. Enrollment of 1,275 patients in the CONFIRM III OUTFLOW Post Market Registry was completed June 2011 Data will be reported at future scientific conferences. ORBIT I Coronary Feasibly Safety Study The ORBIT I trial, a 50 patient study in India, was completed in 2009. This feasibility trial investigated the safety of the Diamondback 360 in treating calcified coronary artery lesions. The safety was evaluated by six months MACE rate. Study results showed the device success for the study was 100%. Six months MACE rate was 8%. The ORBIT I trial confirmed that the OAS is safe in treating subjects with de novo calcified coronary artery disease. The 6 month results will be presented at the TCT conference in 2011 ORBIT II Coronary IDE Study To market the Diamondback 360 in the United States for use in the coronary arteries, we are required to conduct further clinical trials and obtain premarket approval from the FDA. In May 2010, the IDE was FDA approved and we began the ORBIT II pivotal clinical trial. This trial plans to enroll 429 patients in up to 50 U.S. investigational centers to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of the Diamondback 360 in treating severely calcified coronary lesions. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. Sales and Marketing We market and sell the PAD Systems through a direct sales force in the United States. While we sell directly to hospitals and office based laboratories, we have targeted sales and marketing efforts to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists with experience using similar catheter based procedures, such as angioplasty, stenting, and cutting or laser atherectomy. Physician referral programs and peer to peer education are other key elements of our sales strategy. Patient referrals come from general practiti1rs, podiatrists, nephrologists and endocrinologists. We target our marketing efforts to practiti1rs through physician education, medical conferences, seminars, peer reviewed journals and marketing materials. Our sales and marketing program focuses on educating physicians regarding the proper use and application of the PAD Systems; clinical results showing safety and efficacy of products developing relationships with key opinion leaders; and facilitating regional referral marketing programs. We are not marketing our products internationally; however, we will continue to evaluate international opportunities. 12 Table of Contents We executed a Purchasing Agreement with HealthTrust Purchasing Group, L.P., or HPG, that became effective on July 15, 2011 HPG acts as a group purchasing organization for the healthcare providers belonging to HPG as participants. Under the Purchasing Agreement, all of HPG participants located in the United States or its territories are eligible to purchase the PAD Systems and related products at prices set forth in the Purchasing Agreement. HPG has agreed not to contract with more than 1 alternative supplier from which participants may purchase products comparable to ours under the agreement. During the term of the agreement, we have agreed to not solicit any HPG participant to enter into a separate agreement for our products. Research and Development Our research and development efforts are focused in the development of products to penetrate our 3 key target markets below and behind the knee, above the knee and coronary vessels. Research and development projects include the development of electric versions of the PAD Systems, shaft designs, crown designs, and PAD and coronary clinical trials. Research and development expenses for fiscal 2011, fiscal 2010 and fiscal 2009 were $8.9 million, $10.3 million and $14.7 million, respectively. Manufacturing We use internally manufactured and externally sourced comp1nts to manufacture the PAD Systems. Most of the externally sourced comp1nts are available from multiple suppliers; however, a few key comp1nts, including the diamond grit coated crown, micro motors, and printed circuit board assemblies, are single sourced. We assemble the shaft, crown and handle comp1nts on site, and test, pack, seal and label the finished assembly before sending the packaged product to a contract sterilization facility. Upon return from the sterilizer, product is held in inventory prior to shipping to our customers. Our manufacturing facility in Minnesota, including the shaft manufacturing and the controlled environment assembly areas, are equipped to accommodate approximately 30,000 devices per shift annually. It also has storage capacity for approximately 8,000 devices and 50 control units. As the control unit becomes obsolete, we will convert our storage space for use with the Stealth 360 PAD System. Our Pearland, Texas facility is 46,000 square feet and includes a custom built clean room and production space for future expansion of value add processes, including machining and electronics assembly. The facility, when it becomes fully staffed and equipped, will have the capacity to produce approximately 75,000 devices per shift annually. This facility has finished goods storage capacity for greater than 15,000 devices of the PAD Systems and other accessory products and over 500 Stealth 360 saline infusion pumps. We are registered with the FDA as a medical device manufacturer. We have opted to maintain quality assurance and quality management certifications to enable us to market our products in the member states of the European Union, the European Free Trade Association and countries that have entered into Mutual Recognition Agreements with the European Union. We are ISO 134852003 certified, and our renewal is due by December 2012 During the time of commercialization, we have had 2 minor instances of recall, involving 1 single lot of Diamondback 360 devices (eight units), and 2 boxes of ViperWires (ten wires), related to Use By date labeling issues. While these recalls were reported to the FDA, according to regulations, they did not provide a risk to patient safety. A third recall, initiated in 2009 and completed in 2010, involved the ViperSheath, which is owned and manufactured by Thomas Medical Products. As the distributor for the ViperSheath, we were required to recall all unused units from our customers and return them to Thomas Medical Products. All of the unused ViperSheaths were captured and subsequently destroyed by Thomas Medical Products, with FDA observance. Third Party Reimbursement and Pricing Third party payors, including private insurers, and government insurance programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid, pay for a significant portion of patient care provided in the United States. The single largest payor in the United States is the Medicare program, a federal governmental health insurance program administered by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or CMS. Medicare covers certain medical care expenses for eligible elderly and disabled individuals, including a large percentage of the population with PAD who could be 13 Table of Contents treated with the PAD Systems. In addition, private insurers often follow the coverage and reimbursement policies of Medicare. Consequently, Medicare coverage and reimbursement policies are important to our operations. CMS has established Medicare reimbursement codes describing atherectomy products and procedures using atherectomy products, and many private insurers follow these policies. We believe that physicians and hospitals that treat PAD with the PAD Systems will generally be eligible to receive reimbursement from Medicare and private insurers for the cost of the single use catheter and the physician services. The continued availability of insurance coverage and reimbursement for newly approved medical devices is uncertain. The commercial success of our products in both domestic and international markets will be dependent on whether third party coverage and reimbursement is available for patients that use our products. Medicare, Medicaid, health maintenance organizations and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement of new medical devices, and, as a result, they may not continue to provide adequate payment for our products. To position our device for acceptance by third party payors, we may have to agree to a lower net sales price than we might otherwise charge. The continuing efforts of governmental and commercial third party payors to contain or reduce the costs of healthcare may limit our revenue. In some foreign markets, pricing and profitability of medical devices are subject to government control. In the United States, we expect that there will continue to be federal and state proposals for similar controls. Also, the trends toward managed healthcare in the United States and legislation intended to reduce the cost of government insurance programs could significantly influence the purchase of healthcare services and products and may result in lower prices for our products or the exclusion of our products from reimbursement programs. Competition The medical device industry is highly competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other activities of industry participants. The PAD Systems compete with a variety of other products or devices for the treatment of vascular disease, including stents, balloon angioplasty catheters and atherectomy catheters, as well as products used in vascular surgery. Large competitors in the stent and balloon angioplasty market segments include Abbott Laboratories, Boston Scientific, Cook Medical, Johnson & Johnson and Medtronic. We also compete against manufacturers of atherectomy catheters including, among others, Covidien, Spectranetics, Boston Scientific and Pathway Medical Technologies, as well as other manufacturers that may enter the market due to the increasing demand for treatment of vascular disease. Other competitors include pharmaceutical companies that manufacture drugs for the treatment of mild to moderate PAD and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral bypass procedures. We are not aware of any competing catheter systems either currently on the market or in development that also use an orbital motion to create lumens larger than the catheter itself. Because of the size of the peripheral opportunities, competitors and potential competitors have historically dedicated significant resources to aggressively promote their products. We believe that the PAD Systems compete primarily on the basis of safety and efficacy; predictable clinical performance; ease of use; price; physician relationships; customer service and support; and adequate third party reimbursement. 14 Table of Contents Patents and Intellectual Property We rely on a combination of patent, copyright and other intellectual property laws, trade secrets, nondisclosure agreements and other measures to protect our proprietary rights. As of July 31, 2011, we held 21 issued U.S. patents and have 31 U.S. patent applications pending, as well as 63 issued or granted foreign patents and 98 foreign patent applications, each of which corresponds to aspects of our U.S. patents and applications. Our issued U.S. patents expire between 2011 and 2027, and our most important patent, U.S. Patent No. 6,494,890, is due to expire in 2017. Our issued patents and patent applications relate primarily to the design and operation of certain interventional atherectomy devices, including the PAD Systems. These patents and applications include claims covering key aspects of certain rotational atherectomy devices, including the design, manufacture and therapeutic use of certain atherectomy abrasive heads, drive shafts, control systems, handles and couplings. As we continue to research and develop our atherectomy technology, we intend to file additional U.S. and foreign patent applications related to the design, manufacture and therapeutic uses of atherectomy devices. In addition, we hold ten registered U.S. trademarks, six registered marks in Europe, five registered marks in Canada, and 3 U.S. trademark applications pending. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. We seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by requiring our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors to execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. Agreements with our employees also forbid them from bringing the proprietary rights of third parties to us. We also require confidentiality or material transfer agreements from third parties that receive our confidential data or materials. Government Regulation of Medical Devices Governmental authorities in the United States at the federal, state and local levels and in other countries extensively regulate, among other things, the development, testing, manufacture, labeling, promotion, advertising, distribution, marketing and export and import of medical devices such as the PAD Systems. Failure to obtain approval to market our products under development and to meet the ongoing requirements of these regulatory authorities could prevent us from marketing and continuing to market our products. United States The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or FDCA, and the FDA implementing regulations govern medical device design and development, preclinical and clinical testing, premarket clearance or approval, registration and listing, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising and promotion, sales and distribution, export and import, and post market surveillance. Medical devices and their manufacturers are also subject to inspection by the FDA. The FDCA, supplemented by other federal and state laws, also provides civil and criminal penalties for violations of its provisions. We manufacture and market medical devices that are regulated by the FDA, comparable state agencies and regulatory bodies in other countries. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to commercially distribute in the United States will require marketing authorization from the FDA prior to distribution. The 2 primary types of FDA marketing authorization are premarket notification (also called 510(k) clearance) and premarket approval (also called PMA approval). The type of marketing authorization applicable to a device 510(k) clearance or PMA approval is generally linked to classification of the device. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes (Class I, II or III) based on the degree of risk FDA determines to be associated with a device and the extent of control deemed necessary to ensure the device safety and effectiveness. Devices requiring fewer controls because they are deemed to pose lower risk are placed in Class I or II. Class I devices are deemed to pose the least risk and are subject only to general controls applicable to all devices, such as requirements for device labeling, premarket notification, and adherence to the FDA current good manufacturing practice requirements, as reflected in its Quality System Regulation, or QSR. Class II devices are intermediate risk devices that are subject to general controls and may also be subject to special controls such as performance standards, product specific guidance documents, special labeling requirements, patient registries or postmarket 15 Table of Contents surveillance. Class III devices are those for which insufficient information exists to assure safety and effectiveness solely through general or special controls, and include life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, and devices not substantially equivalent to a device that is already legally marketed. Most Class I devices and some Class II devices are exempted by regulation from the 510(k) clearance requirement and can be marketed without prior authorization from FDA. Class I and Class II devices that have not been so exempted are eligible for marketing through the 510(k) clearance pathway. By contrast, devices placed in Class III generally require PMA approval prior to commercial marketing. The PMA approval process is generally more stringent, time consuming and expensive than the 510(k) clearance process. 510(k) Clearance. To obtain 510(k) clearance for a medical device, an applicant must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to a predicate device legally marketed in the United States. A device is substantially equivalent if, with respect to the predicate device, it has the same intended use and has either (i) the same technological characteristics or (ii) different technological characteristics and the information submitted demonstrates that the device is as safe and effective as a legally marketed device and does not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness. A showing of substantial equivalence sometimes, but not always, requires clinical data. Generally, the 510(k) clearance process can exceed 90 days and may extend to a year or more. After a device has received 510(k) clearance for a specific intended use, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, such as a significant change in the design, materials, method of manufacture or intended use, will require a new 510(k) clearance or PMA approval (if the device as modified is not substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device). The determination as to whether new authorization is needed is initially left to the manufacturer; however, the FDA may review this determination to evaluate the regulatory status of the modified product at any time and may require the manufacturer to cease marketing and recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or PMA approval is obtained. The manufacturer may also be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. We received 510(k) clearance for use of the Diamondback 360 as a therapy in patients with PAD in the United States on August 22, 2007. We received additional 510(k) clearances for the control unit used with the Diamondback 360 on October 25, 2007 and for the solid crown version of the Diamondback 360 on November 9, 2007. We were granted 510(k) clearance of the Predator 360 in March 2009 and Stealth 360 in March 2011 Premarket Approval. A PMA application requires the payment of significant user fees and must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive data, including technical, preclinical, clinical and manufacturing data, to demonstrate to the FDA satisfaction the safety and efficacy of the device. A PMA application must also include a complete description of the device and its comp1nts, a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device, and proposed labeling. After a PMA application is submitted and found to be sufficiently complete, the FDA begins an in depth review of the submitted information. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, the FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facility to ensure compliance with the FDA Quality System Regulations, or QSR, which requires manufacturers to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures. FDA review of a PMA application is required by statute to take no longer than 180 days, although the process typically takes significantly longer, and may require several years to complete. The FDA can delay, limit or deny approval of a PMA application for many reasons, including the systems may not be safe or effective to the FDA satisfaction; the data from preclinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support approval; the manufacturing process or facilities used may not meet applicable requirements; and changes in FDA approval policies or adoption of new regulations may require additional data. 16 Table of Contents If the FDA evaluations of both the PMA application and the manufacturing facilities are favorable, the FDA will either issue an approval letter or an approvable letter, which usually contains a number of conditions that must be met in order to secure final approval of the PMA. When and if those conditions have been fulfilled to the satisfaction of the FDA, the agency will issue a PMA approval letter authorizing commercial marketing of the device for certain indications. If the FDA evaluation of the PMA or manufacturing facilities is not favorable, the FDA will deny approval of the PMA or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also determine that additional clinical trials are necessary, in which case the PMA approval may be delayed for several months or years while the trials are conducted and then the data submitted in an amendment to the PMA. Even if a PMA application is approved, the FDA may approve the device with an indication that is narrower or more limited than originally sought. The agency can also impose restrictions on the sale, distribution or use of the device as a condition of approval, or impose post approval requirements such as continuing evaluation and periodic reporting on the safety, efficacy and reliability of the device for its intended use. New PMA applications or PMA supplements may be required for modifications to the manufacturing process, labeling, device specifications, materials or design of a device that is approved through the PMA process. PMA approval supplements often require submission of the same type of information as an initial PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA application and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. We are currently enrolling patients in an FDA approved Investigational Device Exemption (IDE) trial to support a PMA to use the Diamondback 360 as a therapy in treating patients with coronary artery disease. The FDA granted unconditional approval in April 2010 to begin the ORBIT II coronary trial in the United States. This pivotal trial is set up in 2 phases; Phase I allows us to enroll up to 100 patients at as many as 50 U.S. sites, Phase II allows us to expand the trial to the full complement of 429 patients. The FDA granted us approval to move to Phase II in May of 2011 Clinical Trials. Clinical trials are almost always required to support a PMA application and are sometimes required for a 510(k) clearance. These trials generally require submission of an application for an IDE to the FDA. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE application must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for more abbreviated IDE requirements. Generally, clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the IDE application is approved by the FDA and the study protocol and informed consent are approved by appropriate institutional review boards at the clinical trial sites. FDA approval of an IDE allows clinical testing to go forward but does not bind the FDA to accept the results of the trial as sufficient to prove the product safety and efficacy, even if the trial meets its intended success criteria. With certain exceptions, changes made to an investigational plan after an IDE is approved must be submitted in an IDE supplement and approved by FDA (and by governing institutional review boards when appropriate) prior to implementation. All clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with regulations and requirements collectively known as good clinical practice. Good clinical practices include the FDA IDE regulations, which describe the conduct of clinical trials with medical devices, including the recordkeeping, reporting and monitoring responsibilities of sponsors and investigators, and labeling of investigation devices. They also prohibit promotion, test marketing or commercialization of an investigational device and any representation that such a device is safe or effective for the purposes being investigated. Good clinical practices also include the FDA regulations for institutional review board approval and for protection of human subjects (such as informed consent), as well as disclosure of financial interests by clinical investigators. 17 Table of Contents Required records and reports are subject to inspection by the FDA. The results of clinical testing may be unfavorable or, even if the intended safety and efficacy success criteria are achieved, may not be considered sufficient for the FDA to grant approval or clearance of a product. The commencement or completion of any clinical trials may be delayed or halted, or be inadequate to support approval of a PMA application or clearance of a premarket notification for numerous reasons, including, but not limited to, the following the FDA or other regulatory authorities do not approve a clinical trial protocol or a clinical trial (or a change to a previously approved protocol or trial that requires approval), or place a clinical trial on hold; patients do not enroll in clinical trials or follow up at the rate expected; patients do not comply with trial protocols or experience greater than expected adverse side effects; institutional review boards and third party clinical investigators may delay or reject the trial protocol or changes to the trial protocol; third party clinical investigators decline to participate in a trial or do not perform a trial on the anticipated schedule or consistent with the clinical trial protocol, investigator agreements, good clinical practices or other FDA requirements; third party organizations do not perform data collection and analysis in a timely or accurate manner; regulatory inspections of the clinical trials or manufacturing facilities, which may, among other things, require corrective action or suspension or termination of the clinical trials; changes in governmental regulations or administrative actions; the interim or final results of the clinical trial are inconclusive or unfavorable as to safety or efficacy; and the FDA concludes that the trial design is inadequate to demonstrate safety and efficacy. Continuing Regulation. After a device is approved and placed in commercial distribution, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include establishment registration and device listing upon the commencement of manufacturing; the QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during medical device design and manufacturing processes; labeling regulations, which prohibit the promotion of products for unapproved or off label uses and impose other restrictions on labeling and promotional activities; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if malfunctions were to recur; corrections and removal reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections; and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA caused by the device that may present a risk to health. In addition, the FDA may require a company to conduct postmarket surveillance studies or order it to establish and maintain a system for tracking its products through the chain of distribution to the patient level. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, including those applicable to the conduct of clinical trials, can result in enforcement action by the FDA, which may lead to any of the following sanctions warning letters or untitled letters; fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; 18 Table of Contents delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; withdrawal or suspension of FDA approval; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; and criminal prosecution. We and our contract manufacturers, specification developers and suppliers are also required to manufacture our products in compliance with current Good Manufacturing Practice, or GMP, requirements set forth in the QSR. The QSR requires a quality system for the design, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, installation and servicing of marketed devices, and includes extensive requirements with respect to quality management and organization, device design, buildings, equipment, purchase and handling of comp1nts, production and process controls, packaging and labeling controls, device evaluation, distribution, installation, complaint handling, servicing and record keeping. The FDA enforces the QSR through periodic announced and unannounced inspections that may include the manufacturing facilities of subcontractors. If the FDA believes that we or any of our contract manufacturers or regulated suppliers is not in compliance with these requirements, it can shut down our manufacturing operations, require recall of our products, refuse to clear or approve new marketing applications, institute legal proceedings to detain or seize products, enjoin future violations or assess civil and criminal penalties against us or our officers or other employees. Any such action by the FDA would have a material adverse effect on our business. Fraud and Abuse Our operations will be directly, or indirectly through our customers, subject to various state and federal fraud and abuse laws, including, without limitation, the FDCA, federal Anti Kickback Statute and False Claims Act. These laws may impact, among other things, our proposed sales, marketing, and education programs. In addition, these laws require us to screen individuals and other companies, suppliers and vendors in order to ensure that they are not debarred by the federal government and therefore prohibited from doing business in the healthcare industry. The federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, offering, receiving or providing remuneration, directly or indirectly, in exchange for or to induce either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for a good or service, for which payment may be made under a federal healthcare program such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Several courts have interpreted the statute intent requirement to mean that if any 1 purpose of an arrangement involving remuneration is to induce referrals of federal healthcare covered business, the statute has been violated. The Anti Kickback Statute is broad and prohibits many arrangements and practices that are lawful in businesses outside of the healthcare industry. Many states have also adopted laws similar to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, some of which apply to the referral of patients for healthcare Item or services reimbursed by any source, not only the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The federal False Claims Act prohibits persons from knowingly filing or causing to be filed a false claim to, or the knowing use of false statements to obtain payment from, the federal government. Various states have also enacted laws modeled after the federal False Claims Act. In addition to the laws described above, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 created 2 new federal crimes healthcare fraud and false statements relating to healthcare matters. The healthcare fraud statute prohibits knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private payors. The false statements statute prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. Voluntary industry codes, federal guidance documents and a variety of state laws address the tracking and reporting of marketing practices relative to gifts given and other expenditures made to doctors and other 19 Table of Contents healthcare professionals. In addition to impacting our marketing and educational programs, internal business processes will be affected by the numerous legal requirements and regulatory guidance at the state, federal and industry levels. International Regulation International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign government regulations, which may vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain approval in a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval and the requirements may differ. For example, the primary regulatory environment in Europe with respect to medical devices is that of the European Union, which includes most of the major countries in Europe. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices. Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear the CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout the European Union, although actual implementation of these directives may vary on a country by country basis. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the class of the product, but normally involves a combination of submission of a design dossier, self assessment by the manufacturer, a third party assessment and, review of the design dossier by a Notified Body. This third party assessment generally consists of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and manufacturing site, as well as review of the technical documentation used to support application of the CE mark to 1 product and possibly specific testing of the manufacturer product. An assessment by a Notified Body of 1 country within the European Union is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the European Union. We obtained CE marking approval for sale of the Diamondback 360 in May 2005. Environmental Regulation Our operations are subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. We are currently classified and licensed as a Very Small Quantity Hazardous Waste Generator within Ramsey County, Minnesota. There are no regulated wastes requiring licensing in our Texas facility. Employees As of June 30, 2011, we had 286 employees, including 66 employees in manufacturing, 166 employees in sales, six employees in marketing, seven employees in clinical, 23 employees in general and administrative, and 18 employees in research and development, all of which are full time employees. N1 of our employees are represented by a labor union or parties to a collective bargaining agreement, and we believe that our employee relations are good. Item 1A. Risk Factors. Risks Relating to Our Business and Operations We have a history of net losses and may continue to incur losses. We are not profitable and have incurred net losses in each fiscal year since our formation in 1989. In particular, we had net losses of $111 million in fiscal 2011, $239 million in fiscal 2010, and $319 million in fiscal 2009. As of June 30, 2011, we had an accumulated deficit of approximately $1624 million. We commenced commercial sales of the Diamondback 360 in September 2007, and our short commercialization experience makes it difficult for us to predict future performance. We also expect to incur significant additional expenses for sales and marketing and manufacturing as we continue to commercialize the PAD Systems and additional expenses as we seek to develop and commercialize future versions of the PAD Systems and other products. Additionally, we expect that our general and administrative expenses will increase as our business grows. As a result, our operating losses could continue. 20 Table of Contents We may be unable to sustain our revenue growth. Our revenue has grown in each of the 3 complete fiscal years since we commenced commercial sales of the Diamondback 360 in September 2007. Our ability to continue to increase our revenues in future periods will depend on our ability to increase sales of the PAD Systems and new and improved products we introduce, including growing our customer base and reorders of the PAD Systems from those customers. We may not be able to generate, sustain or increase revenues on a quarterly or annual basis. If we cannot achieve or sustain revenue growth for an extended period, our financial results will be adversely affected and our stock price may decline. Economic conditions may adversely affect our business. Adverse worldwide economic conditions may have adverse implications on our business. For example, our customers ability to borrow m1y from their existing lenders or to obtain credit from other sources to fund operations may be impaired resulting in a decrease in sales. Although we review our customers financial condition and ability to pay on an ongoing basis and we maintain allowances for doubtful accounts for estimated losses resulting from the inability of our customers to make required payments, we cannot guarantee that we will continue to experience the same loss rates that we have in the past. A significant change in the liquidity or financial condition of our customers could cause unfavorable trends in our receivable collections and additional allowances may be required, which could adversely affect our operating results. Adverse worldwide economic conditions may also adversely impact our suppliers ability to provide us with materials and comp1nts, which could adversely affect our business and operating results. In addition, uncertainty about current global economic conditions could increase the volatility of our stock price. We have a limited history selling the PAD Systems, which are currently our primary products, and our inability to market these products successfully would have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition. Although we also sell a variety of ancillary products, the PAD Systems are our primary products and we are largely dependent on them. We have limited experience in the commercial manufacturing and marketing of these products. Our ability to generate revenue will depend upon our ability to further successfully commercialize the PAD Systems and to develop, manufacture and receive required regulatory clearances and approvals and patient reimbursement for treatment with future versions of the PAD Systems. As we continue to commercialize the PAD Systems, we may need to expand our sales force to reach our target market. Developing a sales force is expensive and time consuming and could delay or limit the success of any product launch. Thus, we may not be able to expand our sales and marketing capabilities on a timely basis or at all. If we are unable to adequately increase these capabilities, we will need to contract with third parties to market and sell the PAD Systems and any other products that we may develop. To the extent that we enter into arrangements with third parties to perform sales, marketing and distribution services on our behalf, our product revenues could be lower than if we marketed and sold our products on a direct basis. Furthermore, any revenues resulting from co promotion or other marketing and sales arrangements with other companies will depend on the skills and efforts of others, and we do not know whether these efforts will be successful. If we fail to successfully develop, commercialize and market the PAD Systems or any future versions of these products that we develop, our business will be materially adversely affected. The PAD Systems and future products may never achieve broad market acceptance. The PAD Systems and future products we may develop may never gain broad market acceptance among physicians, patients and the medical community. The degree of market acceptance of any of our products will depend on a number of factors, including the actual and perceived effectiveness and reliability of our products; the prevalence and severity of any adverse patient events involving our products; the results of any clinical trials relating to use of our products; 21 Table of Contents the availability, relative cost and perceived advantages and disadvantages of alternative technologies or treatment methods for conditions treated by our systems; the degree to which treatments using our products are approved for reimbursement by public and private insurers; the strength of our marketing and distribution infrastructure; and the level of education and awareness among physicians and hospitals concerning our products. Failure of the PAD Systems to significantly penetrate current or new markets would negatively impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. If longer term or more extensive clinical trials performed by us or others indicate that procedures using the PAD Systems or any future products are not safe, effective and long lasting, physicians may choose not to use our products. Furthermore, unsatisfactory patient outcomes or injuries could cause negative publicity for our products. Physicians may be slow to adopt our products if they perceive liability risks arising from the use of these products. It is also possible that as our products become more widely used, latent defects could be identified, creating negative publicity and liability problems for us, thereby adversely affecting demand for our products. If the PAD Systems and our future products do not achieve an adequate level of acceptance by physicians, patients and the medical community, our overall business and profitability would be harmed. Our future growth depends on physician adoption of the PAD Systems, which requires physicians to change their screening and referral practices. We believe that we must educate physicians to change their screening and referral practices. For example, although there is a significant correlation between PAD and coronary artery disease, many physicians do not routinely screen for PAD while screening for coronary artery disease. We target our sales efforts to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists because they are often the primary care physicians diagnosing and treating both coronary artery disease and PAD. However, the initial point of contact for many patients may be general practiti1rs, podiatrists, nephrologists and endocrinologists, each of whom commonly treats patients experiencing complications resulting from PAD. If referring physicians are not educated about PAD in general and the existence of the PAD Systems in particular, they may not refer patients to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons or interventional radiologists for the procedure using the PAD Systems, and those patients may instead be surgically treated or treated with an alternative interventional procedure. If we are not successful in educating physicians about screening for PAD or referral opportunities, our ability to increase our revenue may be impaired. Our customers may not be able to achieve adequate reimbursement for using the PAD Systems, which could affect the acceptance of our products and cause our business to suffer. The availability of insurance coverage and reimbursement for newly approved medical devices and procedures is uncertain. The commercial success of our products is substantially dependent on whether third party insurance coverage and reimbursement for the use of such products and related services are available. We expect the PAD Systems to generally be purchased by hospitals and other providers who will then seek reimbursement from various public and private third party payors, such as Medicare, Medicaid and private insurers, for the services provided to patients. We can give no assurance that these third party payors will provide adequate reimbursement for use of the PAD Systems to permit hospitals and doctors to consider the products cost effective for patients requiring PAD treatment, or that current reimbursement levels for the PAD Systems will continue. In addition, the overall amount of reimbursement available for PAD treatment could decrease in the future. Failure by hospitals and other users of our products to obtain sufficient reimbursement could cause our business to suffer. Medicare, Medicaid, health maintenance organizations and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement, and, as a result, they may not cover or provide adequate payment for use of the PAD Systems. In order to position the PAD Systems for acceptance by third party payors, we may have to agree to lower prices than we might otherwise charge. 22 Table of Contents Governmental and private sector payors have instituted initiatives to limit the growth of healthcare costs using, for example, price regulation or controls and competitive pricing programs. Some third party payors also require demonstrated superiority, on the basis of randomized clinical trials, or pre approval of coverage, for new or innovative devices or procedures before they will reimburse healthcare providers who use such devices or procedures. It is uncertain whether the PAD Systems or any future products we may develop will be viewed as sufficiently cost effective to warrant adequate coverage and reimbursement levels. If third party coverage and reimbursement for the PAD Systems is limited or not available, the acceptance of the PAD Systems and, consequently, our business will be substantially harmed. Healthcare reform legislation could adversely affect our operating results and financial condition. There have been and continue to be proposals by the federal government, state governments, regulators and third party payors to control healthcare costs and, more generally, to reform the U.S. healthcare system. Certain of these proposals could limit the prices we are able to charge for our products or the amounts of reimbursement available for our products and could limit the acceptance and availability of our products. The adoption of some or all of these proposals, including the recent federal legislation, could adversely affect our revenue and financial condition. On March 23, 2010, President Obama signed the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, or the Patient Act. The impact on the healthcare industry of the Patient Act is extensive and includes, among other things, having the federal government assume a larger role in the healthcare system, expanding healthcare coverage of United States citizens and mandating basic healthcare benefits. Elements of this legislation, such as comparative effectiveness research, an independent payment advisory board, payment system reforms, including shared savings programs and other provisions, could meaningfully change the way healthcare is developed and delivered, and may materially impact numerous aspects of our business. These changes may impact reimbursement for health care services, including reimbursement to hospitals and physicians. States may also enact further legislation that impacts Medicaid payments to hospitals and physicians. In addition, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, the Federal agency responsible for administering the Medicare program, may establish new payment levels for hospitals and physicians in line with the new legislation, which could increase or decrease payment to such entities. The healthcare reform legislation and any future legislative and regulatory initiatives could adversely affect demand for our products and have a material adverse impact on our operating results. Any healthcare reforms enacted in the future may, like the Patient Act, be phased in over a number of years but, if enacted, could reduce our revenues, increase our costs, or require us to revise the ways in which we conduct business or put us at risk for loss of business. Our results of operations, financial position and cash flows could be materially adversely affected by changes under the Patient Act and changes under any federal or state legislation adopted in the future. The Patient Act also imposes significant new taxes on medical device makers. These taxes will result in a significant increase in the tax burden on our industry, which could have a material, negative impact on our results of operations, financial position and cash flows. As rules and regulations are developed under the new law, there may be exemptions created for certain types or classes of products. We may find, however, that there are no exemptions applicable to our products. This tax will impact our cost of doing business and may ultimately lower our profit margins. Additionally, the increased cost of business caused by this tax may hinder our ability to spend m1y on research and development of our products. We may be required to increase the prices of our devices to offset the additional cost of the tax. Medicaid and health insurance providers may place a cap on the reimbursement for purchases of our devices that will not allow us to offset the cost of the tax. We may ultimately lose customers who are unwilling or unable to pay the increased costs, which could adversely affect our business and operating results. We have limited data and experience regarding the safety and efficacy of the PAD Systems. Any long term data that is generated may not be positive or consistent with our limited short term data, which would affect market acceptance of these products. Our success depends on the acceptance of the PAD Systems by the medical community as safe and effective. Because our technology is relatively new in the treatment of PAD, we have performed clinical trials 23 Table of Contents only with limited patient populations. The long term effects of using the PAD Systems in a large number of patients are not known and the results of short term clinical use of the PAD Systems do not necessarily predict long term clinical benefit or reveal long term adverse effects. If the results obtained from any future clinical trials or clinical or commercial experience indicate that the PAD Systems are not as safe or effective as other treatment options or as current short term data would suggest, adoption of these products may suffer and our business would be harmed. Even if we believe that the data collected from clinical trials or clinical experience indicate positive results, each physician actual experience with our device will vary. Clinical trials conducted with the PAD Systems have involved procedures performed by physicians who are very technically proficient. Consequently, both short and long term results reported in these studies may be significantly more favorable than typical results achieved by physicians, which could negatively impact market acceptance of the PAD Systems. We face significant competition and may be unable to sell the PAD Systems at profitable levels. We compete against very large and well known stent and balloon angioplasty device manufacturers, including Abbott Laboratories, Boston Scientific, Cook Medical, Johnson & Johnson and Medtronic. We may have difficulty competing effectively with these competitors because of their well established positions in the marketplace, significant financial and human capital resources, established reputations and worldwide distribution channels. We also compete against manufacturers of atherectomy catheters including, among others, Covidien, Spectranetics, Boston Scientific and Pathway Medical Technologies, as well as other manufacturers that may enter the market due to the increasing demand for treatment of vascular disease. Several other companies provide products used by surgeons in peripheral bypass procedures. Other competitors include pharmaceutical companies that manufacture drugs for the treatment of mild to moderate PAD and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral bypass procedures. Our competitors may develop and patent processes or products earlier than we will; obtain regulatory clearances or approvals for competing medical device products more rapidly than we will; market their products more effectively than we will; or develop more effective or less expensive products or technologies that render our technology or products obsolete or non competitive. We have encountered and expect to continue to encounter potential customers who, due to existing relationships with our competitors, are committed to or prefer the products offered by these competitors. If we are unable to compete successfully, our revenue will suffer. Increased competition might lead to price reductions and other concessions that might adversely affect our operating results. Competitive pressures may decrease the demand for our products and could adversely affect our financial results. Our ability to compete depends on our ability to innovate successfully. If our competitors demonstrate the increased safety or efficacy of their products as compared to ours, our revenue may decline. The market for medical devices is highly competitive, dynamic and marked by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovations. Our ability to compete depends on our ability to innovate successfully, and there are few barriers that would prevent new entrants or existing competitors from developing products that compete directly with our products. Demand for the PAD Systems could be diminished by equivalent or superior products and technologies offered by competitors. Our competitors may produce more advanced products than ours or demonstrate superior safety and efficacy of their products. If we are unable to innovate successfully, the PAD Systems could become obsolete and our revenue would decline as our customers purchase competitor products. 24 Table of Contents We have limited commercial manufacturing experience and could experience difficulty in producing the PAD Systems or will need to depend on third parties to manufacture the products. We have limited experience in commercially manufacturing the PAD Systems and have no experience manufacturing these products in the volume that we anticipate will be required if we achieve planned levels of commercial sales. As a result, we may not be able to develop and implement efficient, low cost manufacturing capabilities and processes that will enable us to manufacture the PAD Systems or future products in significant volumes, while meeting the legal, regulatory, quality, price, durability, engineering, design and production standards required to market our products successfully. If we fail to develop and implement these manufacturing capabilities and processes, we may be unable to profitably commercialize the PAD Systems and any future products we may develop because the per unit cost of our products is highly dependent upon production volumes and the level of automation in our manufacturing processes. There are technical challenges to increasing manufacturing capacity, including equipment design and automation capabilities, material procurement, problems with production yields and quality control and assurance. Increasing our manufacturing capacity may require that we invest substantial additional funds and hire and retain additional management and technical personnel who have the necessary manufacturing experience. We may not successfully complete any required increase in manufacturing capacity in a timely manner or at all. If we are unable to manufacture a sufficient supply of our products, maintain control over expenses or otherwise adapt to anticipated growth, or if we underestimate growth, we may not have the capability to satisfy market demand and our business will suffer. The forecasts of demand we use to determine order quantities and lead times for comp1nts purchased from outside suppliers may be incorrect. Failure to obtain required comp1nts or subassemblies when needed and at a reasonable cost would adversely affect our business. In addition, we may in the future need to depend upon third parties to manufacture the PAD Systems and future products. We also cannot assure you that any third party contract manufacturers will have the ability to produce the quantities of our products needed for development or commercial sales or will be willing to do so at prices that allow the products to compete successfully in the market. Additionally, we can give no assurance that even if we do contract with third party manufacturers for production that these manufacturers will not experience manufacturing difficulties or experience quality or regulatory issues. Any difficulties in locating and hiring third party manufacturers, or in the ability of third party manufacturers to supply quantities of our products at the times and in the quantities we need, could have a material adverse effect on our business. We depend upon third party suppliers, including single source suppliers to us and our customers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations. We rely on third party suppliers to provide us with certain comp1nts of our products and to provide key comp1nts or supplies to our customers for use with our products. We rely on single source suppliers for the comp1nts of the PAD Systems. We purchase comp1nts from these suppliers on a purchase order basis and carry only limited levels of inventory for these comp1nts. If we underestimate our requirements, we may not have an adequate supply, which could interrupt manufacturing of our products and result in delays in shipments and loss of revenue. Conversely, an overestimation of our requirements will reduce our cash available for operations and may result in excess or obsolete materials. We depend on our suppliers to provide us and our customers with materials in a timely manner that meet our and their quality, quantity and cost requirements. These suppliers may encounter problems during manufacturing for a variety of reasons, any of which could delay or impede their ability to meet our demand and our customers demand. Our reliance on these outside suppliers also subjects us to other risks that could harm our business, including interruption of supply resulting from modifications to, or discontinuation of, a supplier operations; delays in product shipments; price fluctuations; our suppliers may make errors in manufacturing comp1nts; 25 Table of Contents our suppliers may discontinue production of comp1nts; we and our customers may not be able to obtain adequate supplies in a timely manner or on commercially acceptable terms; we and our customers may have difficulty locating and qualifying alternative suppliers for our and their sole source supplies; switching comp1nts may require product redesign and new regulatory submissions; we may experience production delays related to the evaluation and testing of products from alternative suppliers and corresponding regulatory qualifications; our suppliers manufacture products for a range of customers, and fluctuations in demand for the products these suppliers manufacture for others may affect their ability to deliver comp1nts to us or our customers in a timely manner; and our suppliers may encounter financial hardships unrelated to us or our customers demand for comp1nts or other products. Any supply interruption from our suppliers or failure to obtain additional suppliers for any of the comp1nts used in our products would limit our ability to manufacture our products and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we lost 1 of these suppliers and were unable to obtain an alternate source on a timely basis or on terms acceptable to us, our production schedules could be delayed, our margins could be negatively impacted, and we could fail to meet our customers demand. Our customers rely upon our ability to meet committed delivery dates and any disruption in the supply of key comp1nts would adversely affect our ability to meet these dates and could result in legal action by our customers, cause us to lose customers or harm our ability to attract new customers, any of which could decrease our revenue and negatively impact our growth. In addition, to the extent that our suppliers use technology or manufacturing processes that are proprietary, we may be unable to obtain comparable materials or comp1nts from alternative sources. We may be faced with a supplier decision to discontinue manufacturing a comp1nt, which may force us or our customers to make last time purchases, qualify a substitute part, or make a design change which may divert engineering time away from the development of new products. Consolidation in the healthcare industry could lead to demands for price concessions or the exclusion of some suppliers from our market segment, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. The cost of healthcare has risen significantly over the past decade and numerous initiatives and reforms by legislators, regulators and third party payors to curb these costs have resulted in a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry. This in turn has resulted in greater pricing pressures and the exclusion of certain suppliers from important market segments as group purchasing organizations, independent delivery ne2rks and large single accounts continue to consolidate purchasing decisions for some of our hospital customers. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party reimbursement policies, government contracting requirements, and societal pressures will continue to change the worldwide healthcare industry, resulting in further business consolidations and alliances among our customers and competitors, which may reduce competition, exert downward pressure on the prices of our products and adversely impact our business, financial condition or results of operations. We may need to increase the size of our organization and we may experience difficulties managing growth. If we are unable to manage the anticipated growth of our business, our future revenue and operating results may be adversely affected. The growth we may experience in the future may provide challenges to our organization, requiring us to rapidly expand our sales and marketing personnel and manufacturing operations. Our sales and marketing force 26 Table of Contents has increased from six full time employees on January 1, 2007 to 172 full time employees on June 30, 2011, and we expect to continue to grow our sales and marketing force in the future. We also expect to significantly expand our manufacturing operations to meet anticipated growth in demand for our products. Rapid expansion in personnel may result in less experienced people producing and selling our product, which could result in unanticipated costs and disruptions to our operations. If we cannot scale and manage our business appropriately, our anticipated growth may be impaired and our financial results will suffer. We may require additional financing, and our failure to obtain additional financing when needed could force us to delay, reduce or eliminate our product development programs or commercialization efforts. We may be dependent on additional financing to execute our business plan. We may require additional capital in order to continue to conduct the research and development and obtain regulatory clearances and approvals necessary to bring any future products to market and to establish effective marketing and sales capabilities for existing and future products. Our operating plan may change, and we may need additional funds so1r than anticipated to meet our operational needs and capital requirements for product development, clinical trials and commercialization. Additional funds may not be available when we need them on terms that are acceptable to us, or at all. If adequate funds are not available on a timely basis, we may terminate or delay the development of 1 or more of our products, or delay establishment of sales and marketing capabilities or other activities necessary to commercialize our products. Our future capital requirements will depend on many factors, including the costs of expanding our sales and marketing infrastructure and our manufacturing operations; the degree of success we experience in commercializing the PAD Systems; the number and types of future products we develop and commercialize; the costs, timing and outcomes of regulatory reviews associated with our future product candidates; the costs of preparing, filing and prosecuting patent applications and maintaining, enforcing and defending intellectual property related claims; and the extent and scope of our general and administrative expenses. Disruptions in the global financial markets, including the bankruptcy, failure, collapse or sale of various financial institutions and an unprecedented level of intervention from the United States and other governments and the related liquidity crisis, considerably disrupted the credit and capital markets at the end of 2008 and markets have not fully recovered since then. In the event we need or desire additional financing, we may be unable to obtain it by borrowing m1y in the credit markets or raising m1y in the capital markets. We face a risk of non compliance with the financial covenants in our loan and security agreements with Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth. We are party to loan and security agreements with Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth. These agreements require us to maintain, among other things, a monthly specified liquidity ratio and a monthly adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, or EBITDA, level. The agreements contain customary events of default, including, among others, the failure to comply with certain covenants or other agreements. Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an event of default, amounts due under the agreements may be accelerated by Silicon Valley Bank or Partners for Growth. We were not in compliance with some of the financial covenants contained in our prior loan agreement with Silicon Valley Bank during certain months in the year ended June 30, 2010, which Silicon Valley Bank waived and these covenants were subsequently changed in our amended and restated loan and security agreement with Silicon Valley Bank. If we are unable to meet the financial or other covenants under the current loan and security agreements or negotiate future waivers or amendments of such covenants, events of default could occur under the agreements. Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an event of default under the agreements, Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth have available a range of remedies customary in these circumstances, including declaring all 27 Table of Contents outstanding debt, together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to be due and payable, foreclosing on the assets securing the agreements and or ceasing to provide additional loans, which could have a material adverse effect on us. The restrictive covenants in our loan and security agreements could limit our ability to conduct our business and respond to changing economic and business conditions and may place us at a competitive disadvantage relative to other companies that are subject to fewer restrictions. Our loan and security agreements with Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth limit our ability to, among other things transfer all or any part of our business or properties; permit or suffer a change in control; merge or consolidate, or acquire any entity; incur additional indebtedness or liens with respect to any of their properties; pay dividends or make any other distribution on or purchase of, any of our capital stock; make investments in other companies; or engage in related party transactions. The restrictive covenants under these agreements could limit our ability to obtain future financing, withstand a future downturn in our business or the economy in general or otherwise conduct necessary corporate activities. The financial and restrictive covenants contained in the agreements could also adversely affect our ability to respond to changing economic and business conditions and place us at a competitive disadvantage relative to other companies that may be subject to fewer restrictions. Transactions that we may view as important opportunities, such as acquisitions, may be subject to the consent of Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth, which consents may be withheld or granted subject to conditions specified at the time that may affect the attractiveness or viability of the transaction. We do not intend to market the PAD Systems internationally in the near future, which will limit our potential revenue from these products. While we plan to continue to evaluate the financial viability of marketing the PAD Systems internationally, we currently do not intend to market the PAD Systems internationally in the near future in order to focus our resources and efforts on the U.S. market, as international efforts would require substantial additional sales and marketing, regulatory and personnel expenses. Our decision to market these products only in the United States will limit our ability to reach all of our potential markets and will limit our potential sources of revenue. In addition, our competitors will have an opportunity to further penetrate and achieve market share abroad until such time, if ever, that we market the PAD Systems or other products internationally. We are dependent on our senior management team and highly skilled personnel, and our business could be harmed if we are unable to attract and retain personnel necessary for our success. We are highly dependent on our senior management, especially David L. Martin, our President and Chief Executive Officer. Our success will depend on our ability to retain senior management and to attract and retain qualified personnel in the future, including scientists, clinicians, engineers and other highly skilled personnel and to integrate current and additional personnel in all departments. Competition for senior management personnel, as well as scientists, clinical and regulatory specialists, engineers and sales personnel, is intense and we may not be able to retain our personnel. The loss of members of our senior management, scientists, clinical and regulatory specialists, engineers and sales personnel could prevent us from achieving our objectives of continuing to grow the company. The loss of a member of our senior management or professional staff would require the remaining senior executive officers to divert immediate and substantial attention to seeking a replacement. In particular, we expect to substantially increase the size of our sales force, which will require management attention. We do not carry key person life insurance on any of our employees. 28 Table of Contents Risks Related to Government Regulation Our ability to market the PAD Systems in the United States is limited to use as a therapy in patients with PAD, and if we want to expand our marketing claims, we will need to file for additional FDA clearances or approvals and conduct further clinical trials, which would be expensive and time consuming and may not be successful. The PAD Systems received FDA 510(k) clearances in the United States for use as a therapy in patients with PAD. This general clearance restricts our ability to market or advertise the PAD Systems beyond this use and could affect our growth. While off label uses of medical devices are common and the FDA does not regulate physicians choice of treatments, the FDA does restrict a manufacturer communications regarding such off label use. We are not permitted to promote or advertise the PAD Systems for off label uses. In addition, we cannot make comparative claims regarding the use of the PAD Systems against any alternative treatments without conducting head to head comparative clinical trials, which would be expensive and time consuming. If our promotional activities fail to comply with the FDA regulations or guidelines, we may be subject to FDA warnings or enforcement action. If we determine to market the PAD Systems in the United States for other uses, for instance, use in the coronary arteries, we would need to conduct further clinical trials and obtain premarket approval from the FDA. In 2008, we completed the ORBIT I trial, a 50 patient study in India which investigated the safety of the Diamondback 360 in treating calcified coronary artery lesions, and results successfully met both safety and efficacy endpoints. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. Clinical trials are complex, expensive, time consuming, uncertain and subject to substantial and unanticipated delays. Clinical trials generally involve a substantial number of patients in 1 or more multi year studies. We may encounter problems with our clinical trials, and any of those problems could cause us or the FDA to suspend those trials, or delay the analysis of the data derived from them. A number of events or factors, including any of the following, could delay the completion of our clinical trials in the future and negatively impact our ability to obtain FDA clearance or approval for, and to introduce, a particular future product delays in obtaining or maintaining required approvals from institutional review boards or other reviewing entities at clinical sites selected for participation in our clinical trials; insufficient supply of our future product candidates or other materials necessary to conduct our clinical trials; difficulties in enrolling patients in our clinical trials; negative or inconclusive results from clinical trials, results that are inconsistent with earlier results, or the likelihood that the part of the human anatomy involved is more pr1 to serious adverse events, necessitating additional clinical trials; serious or unexpected side effects experienced by patients who use our future product candidates; or failure by any of our third party contractors or investigators to comply with regulatory requirements or meet other contractual obligations in a timely manner. Our clinical trials may not begin as planned, may need to be redesigned, and may not be completed on schedule, if at all. Delays in our clinical trials may result in increased development costs for our future product candidates, which could limit our ability to obtain additional financing. In addition, if 1 or more of our clinical trials is delayed, competitors may be able to bring products to market before we do, and the commercial viability of our future product candidates could be significantly reduced. 29 Table of Contents We may become subject to regulatory actions if we are found to have promoted the PAD Systems for unapproved uses. If the FDA determines that our promotional materials, training or other activities constitute promotion of our products for unapproved uses, it could request that we cease use of or modify our training or promotional materials or subject us to regulatory enforcement actions, including the issuance of an untitled or warning letter, injunction, seizure, civil fine and criminal penalties. It is also possible that other federal, state or foreign enforcement authorities might take action if they consider promotional, training or other materials to constitute promotion of our products for an unapproved or uncleared use, which could result in significant fines or penalties under other statutory authorities, such as laws prohibiting false claims for reimbursement. The PAD Systems may in the future be subject to product recalls that could harm our reputation. The FDA and similar governmental authorities in other countries have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products in the event of material regulatory deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture. A government mandated or voluntary recall by us could occur as a result of comp1nt failures, manufacturing errors or design or labeling defects. During the time of commercialization, we have had 2 minor instances of recall, involving a single lot of Diamondback 360 devices (eight units), and 2 boxes of ViperWires (ten wires), related to Use By date labeling issues. In addition, a third recall, initiated in 2009 and completed in 2010, involved the ViperSheath, which is owned and manufactured by Thomas Medical Products. As the distributor for the ViperSheath, we were required to recall all unused units from our customers and return them to Thomas Medical Products. Any additional recalls of our products or products that we distribute would divert managerial and financial resources, harm our reputation with customers and have an adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. If we or our suppliers fail to comply with ongoing regulatory requirements, or if we experience unanticipated problems, our products could be subject to restrictions or withdrawal from the market. The PAD Systems and related manufacturing processes, clinical data, adverse events, recalls or corrections and promotional activities, are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA and other regulatory bodies. In particular, we are required to comply with the FDA Quality System Regulation, or QSR, and other regulations, which cover the methods and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, storage and shipping of any product for which we obtain marketing clearance or approval. We are also responsible for the quality of comp1nts received by our suppliers. Failure to comply with the QSR requirements or other statutes and regulations administered by the FDA and other regulatory bodies, or failure to adequately respond to any observations, could result in, among other things warning or other letters from the FDA; fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; withdrawal or suspension of approval or clearance by the FDA or other regulatory bodies; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; and criminal prosecution. If any of these actions were to occur, it would harm our reputation and cause our product sales to suffer. Furthermore, any modification to a device that has received FDA clearance or approval that could significantly affect its safety or efficacy, or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, design or 30 Table of Contents manufacture, requires a new clearance or approval from the FDA. If the FDA disagrees with any determination by us that new clearance or approval is not required, we may be required to cease marketing or to recall the modified product until we obtain clearance or approval. In addition, we could be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. Regulatory clearance or approval of a product may also require costly post marketing testing or surveillance to monitor the safety or efficacy of the product. Later discovery of previously unknown problems with our products, including unanticipated adverse events or adverse events of unanticipated severity or frequency, manufacturing problems, or failure to comply with regulatory requirements such as the QSR, may result in restrictions on such products or manufacturing processes, withdrawal of the products from the market, voluntary or mandatory recalls, fines, suspension of regulatory approvals, product seizures, injunctions or the imposition of civil or criminal penalties. The use, misuse or off label use of the PAD Systems may increase the risk of injury, which could result in product liability claims and damage to our business. The use, misuse or off label use of the PAD Systems may result in injuries that lead to product liability suits, which could be costly to our business. The PAD Systems are not FDA cleared or approved for treatment of the carotid arteries, the coronary arteries, within bypass grafts or stents, of thrombus or where the lesion cannot be crossed with a guidewire or a significant dissection is present at the lesion site. We cannot prevent a physician from using the PAD Systems for off label applications. The off label use of the PAD Systems may be more likely to result in complications that have serious consequences, including, in certain circumstances, death. We may face risks related to product liability claims, which could exceed the limits of available insurance coverage. If the PAD Systems are defectively designed, manufactured or labeled, contain defective comp1nts or are misused, we may become subject to costly litigation by our customers or their patients. The medical device industry is subject to substantial litigation, and we face an inherent risk of exposure to product liability claims in the event that the use of our products results or is alleged to have resulted in adverse effects to a patient. In most jurisdictions, producers of medical products are strictly liable for personal injuries caused by medical devices. We may be subject in the future to claims for personal injuries arising out of the use of our products. Product liability claims could divert management attention from our core business, be expensive to defend and result in sizable damage awards against us. A product liability claim against us, even if ultimately unsuccessful, could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations, and reputation. While we have product liability insurance coverage for our products and intend to maintain such insurance coverage in the future, there can be no assurance that we will be adequately protected from the claims that will be brought against us. Compliance with environmental laws and regulations could be expensive. Failure to comply with environmental laws and regulations could subject us to significant liability. Our operations are subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. Although we are currently classified as a Very Small Quantity Hazardous Waste Generator within Ramsey County, Minnesota, we cannot ensure that we will maintain our licensed status as such, nor can we ensure that we will not incur material costs or liability in connection with our operations, or that our past or future operations will not result in claims or injury by employees or the public. Environmental laws and regulations could also become more stringent over time, imposing greater compliance costs and increasing risks and penalties associated with violations. 31 Table of Contents We and our distributors must comply with various federal and state anti kickback, self referral, false claims and similar laws, any breach of which could cause a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our relationships with physicians, hospitals and the marketers of our products are subject to scrutiny under various federal anti kickback, self referral, false claims and similar laws, often referred to collectively as healthcare fraud and abuse laws. Healthcare fraud and abuse laws are complex, and even minor, inadvertent violations can give rise to claims that the relevant law has been violated. If our operations are found to be in violation of these laws, we, as well as our employees, may be subject to penalties, including m1tary fines, civil and criminal penalties, exclusion from federal and state healthcare programs, including Medicare, Medicaid, Veterans Administration health programs, workers compensation programs and TRICARE (the healthcare system administered by or on behalf of the U.S. Department of Defense for uniformed services beneficiaries, including active duty and their dependents, retirees and their dependents), and forfeiture of amounts collected in violation of such prohibitions. Individual employees may need to defend such suits on behalf of us or themselves, which could lead to significant disruption in our present and future operations. Certain states in which we intend to market our products have similar fraud and abuse laws, imposing substantial penalties for violations. Any government investigation or a finding of a violation of these laws would likely have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Anti kickback laws and regulations prohibit any knowing and willful offer, payment, solicitation or receipt of any form of remuneration in return for the referral of an individual or the ordering or recommending of the use of a product or service for which payment may be made by Medicare, Medicaid or other government sponsored healthcare programs. In addition, the cost of non compliance with these laws could be substantial, since we could be subject to m1tary fines and civil or criminal penalties, and we could also be excluded from federally funded healthcare programs for non compliance. We have entered into consulting agreements with physicians, including some who may make referrals to us or order our products. 1 of these physicians was 1 of 20 principal investigators in our OASIS clinical trial at the same time he was acting as a paid consultant for us. In addition, prior to our merger with Replidyne, some of these physicians purchased our stock in arm s length transactions on terms identical to those offered to non physicians or received stock options from us as consideration for consulting services performed by them. We believe that these consulting agreements and equity investments by physicians are common practice in our industry, and while these transactions were structured with the intention of complying with all applicable laws, including the federal ban on physician self referrals, commonly known as the Stark Law, state anti referral laws and other applicable anti kickback laws, it is possible that regulatory or enforcement agencies or courts may in the future view these transactions as prohibited arrangements that must be restructured or for which we would be subject to other significant civil or criminal penalties, or prohibit us from accepting referrals from these physicians. Because our strategy relies on the involvement of physicians who consult with us on the design of our product, we could be materially impacted if regulatory or enforcement agencies or courts interpret our financial relationships with our physician advisors who refer or order our products to be in violation of applicable laws and determine that we would be unable to achieve compliance with such applicable laws. This could harm our reputation and the reputations of our clinical advisors. The scope and enforcement of all of these laws is uncertain and subject to rapid change. There can be no assurance that federal or state regulatory or enforcement authorities will not investigate or challenge our current or future activities under these laws. Any investigation or challenge could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Any state or federal regulatory or enforcement review of us, regardless of the outcome, would be costly and time consuming. Additionally, we cannot predict the impact of any changes in these laws, whether these changes are retroactive or will have effect on a going forward basis only. 32 Table of Contents We incur significant costs as a result of operating as a public company, and our management is required to devote substantial time to compliance initiatives. As a public company, we incur significant legal, accounting and other expenses. In addition, the Sarbanes Oxley Act, as well as rules subsequently implemented by the SEC and the Nasdaq Global Market, have imposed various requirements on public companies, including requiring the establishment and maintenance of effective disclosure and financial controls and changes in corporate governance practices. Our management and other personnel devote a substantial amount of time to these compliance initiatives. Moreover, these rules and regulations have increased our legal and compliance costs and made some activities more time consuming and costly. We cannot ensure that our corporate compliance program is in compliance with or will continue to comply with all potentially applicable regulations. The Sarbanes Oxley Act requires, among other things, that we maintain effective internal controls for financial reporting and disclosure controls and procedures. In particular, we must perform system and process evaluation and testing of our internal controls over financial reporting to allow management and our independent registered public accounting firm to report on the effectiveness of our internal controls over financial reporting. Our testing, or the subsequent testing by our independent registered public accounting firm, may reveal deficiencies in our internal controls over financial reporting that are deemed to be material weaknesses. Moreover, if we are not able to comply with these requirements in a timely manner, or if we or our independent registered public accounting firm identifies deficiencies in our internal controls over financial reporting that are deemed to be material weaknesses, the market price of our stock could decline and we could be subject to sanctions or investigations by Nasdaq, the SEC or other regulatory authorities, which would require additional financial and management resources. These obligations divert management time and attention away from our business. Our management may not be able to effectively and timely implement controls and procedures that adequately respond to the increased regulatory compliance and reporting requirements that are applicable. If we fail to staff our accounting and finance function adequately or maintain internal controls adequate to meet the demands that are placed upon us a public company, including the requirements of the Sarbanes Oxley Act, we may be unable to report our financial results accurately or in a timely manner, and our business and stock price may suffer. The costs of being a public company, as well as diversion of management time and attention, may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Additionally, these laws and regulations could make it more difficult or more costly for us to obtain certain types of insurance, including director and officer liability insurance, and we may be forced to accept reduced policy limits and coverage or incur substantially higher costs to obtain the same or similar coverage. The impact of these events could also make it more difficult for us to attract and retain qualified persons to serve on our board of directors, board committees or as executive officers. Risks Relating to Our Intellectual Property Our inability to adequately protect our intellectual property could allow our competitors and others to produce products based on our technology, which could substantially impair our ability to compete. Our success and ability to compete depends, in part, upon our ability to maintain the proprietary nature of our technologies. We rely on a combination of patents, copyrights and trademarks, as well as trade secrets and nondisclosure agreements, to protect our intellectual property. As of July 31, 2011, we had a portfolio of 21 issued U.S. patents, 31 pending U.S. patent applications, 63 issued or granted non U.S. patents, and 98 pending non U.S. patent applications covering aspects of our core technology, which expire between 2011 and 2027. However, our issued patents and related intellectual property may not be adequate to protect us or permit us to gain or maintain a competitive advantage. The issuance of a patent is not conclusive as to its scope, validity or enforceability. The scope, validity or enforceability of our issued patents can be challenged in litigation or proceedings before the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, or the USPTO. In addition, our pending patent applications include claims to numerous important aspects of our products under development that are not currently protected by any of our issued patents. We cannot assure you that any of our pending patent applications will result in the issuance of patents to us. The USPTO may deny or require significant narrowing of 33 Table of Contents claims in our pending patent applications. Even if any patents are issued as a result of pending patent applications, they may not provide us with significant commercial protection or be issued in a form that is advantageous to us. Proceedings before the USPTO could result in adverse decisions as to the priority of our inventions and the narrowing or invalidation of claims in issued patents. Further, if any patents we obtain or license are deemed invalid and unenforceable, or have their scope narrowed, it could impact our ability to commercialize or license our technology. Changes in either the patent laws or in interpretations of patent laws in the United States and other countries may diminish the value of our intellectual property. For instance, the U.S. Supreme Court has recently modified some tests used by the USPTO in granting patents during the past 20 years, which may decrease the likelihood that we will be able to obtain patents and increase the likelihood of challenge of any patents we obtain or license. In addition, the U.S. Congress is now considering patent reform legislation that could transition the U.S. to a first to file system and alter the processes for challenging issued patents. These reforms could increase the uncertainties surrounding the prosecution of our patent applications and the enforcement of our issued patents. The laws of some foreign countries may not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States, if at all. We may, in the future, need to assert claims of infringement against third parties to protect our intellectual property. The outcome of litigation to enforce our intellectual property rights in patents, copyrights, trade secrets or trademarks is highly unpredictable, could result in substantial costs and diversion of resources, and could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, reputation and results of operations regardless of the final outcome of such litigation. In the event of an adverse judgment, a court could hold that some or all of our asserted intellectual property rights are not infringed, invalid or unenforceable, and could order us to pay third party attorneys fees. Despite our efforts to safeguard our unpatented and unregistered intellectual property rights, we may not be successful in doing so or the steps taken by us in this regard may not be adequate to detect or deter misappropriation of our technology or to prevent an unauthorized third party from copying or otherwise obtaining and using our products, technology or other information that we regard as proprietary. In addition, we may not have sufficient resources to litigate, enforce or defend our intellectual property rights. Additionally, third parties may be able to design around our patents. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. In this regard, we seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by having a policy that our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. Agreements with our employees also forbid them from bringing the proprietary rights of third parties to us. We also require confidentiality or material transfer agreements from third parties that receive our confidential data or materials. However, trade secrets are difficult to protect. We cannot provide any assurance that employees and third parties will abide by the confidentiality or assignment terms of these agreements, or that we will be effective securing necessary assignments from these third parties. Despite measures taken to protect our intellectual property, unauthorized parties might copy aspects of our products or obtain and use information that we regard as proprietary. Enforcing a claim that a third party illegally obtained and is using any of our trade secrets is expensive and time consuming, and the outcome is unpredictable. In addition, courts outside the United States are sometimes less willing to protect trade secrets. Finally, others may independently discover trade secrets and proprietary information, and this would prevent us from asserting any such trade secret rights against these parties. Claims of infringement or misappropriation of the intellectual property rights of others could prohibit us from commercializing products, require us to obtain licenses from third parties or require us to develop non infringing alternatives, and subject us to substantial m1tary damages and injunctive relief. The medical technology industry is characterized by extensive litigation and administrative proceedings over patent and other intellectual property rights. The likelihood that patent infringement or misappropriation claims may be brought against us increases as we achieve more visibility in the marketplace and introduce 34 Table of Contents products to market. All issued patents are entitled to a presumption of validity under the laws of the United States. Whether a product infringes a patent involves complex legal and factual issues, the determination of which is often uncertain. Therefore, we cannot be certain that we have not infringed the intellectual property rights of such third parties or others. Our competitors may assert that our products are covered by U.S. or foreign patents held by them. We are aware of numerous patents issued to third parties that relate to the manufacture and use of medical devices for interventional cardiology. The owners of each of these patents could assert that the manufacture, use or sale of our products infringes 1 or more claims of their patents. Because patent applications may take years to issue, there may be applications now pending of which we are unaware that may later result in issued patents that we infringe. If another party has filed a U.S. patent application on inventions similar to ours, we may have to participate in an interference proceeding declared by the USPTO to determine priority of invention in the United States. The costs of these proceedings can be substantial, and it is possible that such efforts would be unsuccessful if unbeknownst to us, the other party had independently arrived at the same or similar invention prior to our own invention, resulting in a loss of our U.S. patent position with respect to such inventions. There could also be existing patents of which we are unaware that 1 or more aspects of our technology may inadvertently infringe. In some cases, litigation may be threatened or brought by a patent holding company or other adverse patent owner who has no relevant product revenues and against whom our patents may provide little or no deterrence. Any infringement or misappropriation claim could cause us to incur significant costs, place significant strain on our financial resources, divert management attention from our business and harm our reputation. Some of our competitors may be able to sustain the costs of complex patent litigation more effectively than we can because they have substantially greater resources. In addition, any uncertainties resulting from the initiation and continuation of any litigation could have a material adverse effect on our ability to raise the funds necessary to continue our operations. Although patent and intellectual property disputes in the medical device area have often been settled through licensing or similar arrangements, costs associated with such arrangements may be substantial and could include ongoing royalties. If the relevant patents were upheld in litigation as valid and enforceable and we were found to infringe, we could be prohibited from commercializing any infringing products unless we could obtain licenses to use the technology covered by the patent or are able to design around the patent. We may be unable to obtain a license on terms acceptable to us, if at all, and we may not be able to redesign any infringing products to avoid infringement. Further, any redesign may not receive FDA clearance or approval or may not receive such clearance or approval in a timely manner. Any such license could impair operating margins on future product revenue. A court could also order us to pay compensatory damages for such infringement, and potentially treble damages, plus prejudgment interest and third party attorneys fees. These damages could be substantial and could harm our reputation, business, financial condition and operating results. A court also could enter orders that temporarily, preliminarily or permanently enjoin us and our customers from making, using, selling, offering to sell or importing infringing products, or could enter an order mandating that we undertake certain remedial activities. Depending on the nature of the relief ordered by the court, we could become liable for additional damages to third parties. Adverse determinations in a judicial or administrative proceeding or failure to obtain necessary licenses could prevent us from manufacturing and selling our products, which would have a significant adverse impact on our business. Risks Relating to Ownership of Our Common Stock Our stock price is volatile and you may not be able to resell your shares. The market price of our common stock could be subject to significant fluctuations. Market prices for securities of early stage pharmaceutical, medical device, biotechnology and other life sciences companies have historically been particularly volatile. Our common stock traded as low as $375 and as high as $15.72 per share during the twelve month period ended June 30, 2011 In addition to the risk factors described in this section, factors that may cause the market price of our common stock to fluctuate include, but are not limited to announcements of technological or medical innovations for the treatment of vascular disease; quarterly variations in our or our competitors results of operations; failure to meet estimates or recommendations by securities analysts who cover our stock; 35 Table of Contents accusations that we have violated a law or regulation; sales of large blocks of our common stock, including sales by our executive officers, directors and significant stockholders; changes in accounting principles; and general market conditions and other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance or the operating performance of our competitors. In addition, if securities class action litigation is initiated against us, we would incur substantial costs and our management attention would be diverted from operations. All of these factors could cause the price of our stock to decline, and you may lose some or all of your investment. Moreover, the stock markets in general have experienced substantial volatility that has often been unrelated to the operating performance of individual companies. These broad market fluctuations may also adversely affect the trading price of our common stock. In the past, following periods of volatility in the market price of a company securities, stockholders have often instituted class action securities litigation against such company. Such litigation, if instituted, could result in substantial costs and diversion of management attention and resources, which could significantly harm our profitability and reputation. We do not expect to pay cash dividends for the foreseeable future, and accordingly, stockholders must rely on stock appreciation for any return on their investment in the company. We anticipate that we will retain our earnings, if any, for future growth and therefore do not anticipate that we will pay cash dividends for the foreseeable future. As a result, appreciation of the price of our common stock is the only potential source of return to stockholders. Investors seeking cash dividends should not invest in our common stock. If equity research analysts cease to publish research or reports about our business or if they issue unfavorable research or downgrade our common stock, the price of our common stock could decline. Investors look to reports of equity research analysts for additional information regarding our industry and operations and rely in part on the research and reports that equity research analysts publish about us and our business. We do not control these analysts. Equity research analysts may elect to cease research coverage of our common stock, which may adversely affect the market price of our common stock. The price of our common stock could decline if 1 or more of these analysts downgrade the common stock or if they issue other unfavorable commentary about us or our business. Some provisions of our charter documents and Delaware law may have anti takeover effects that could discourage an acquisition of us by others, even if an acquisition would be beneficial to our stockholders. Provisions in our restated certificate of incorporation and bylaws, as well as provisions of Delaware law, could make it more difficult for a third party to acquire us, even if doing so would benefit our stockholders. These provisions include providing that special meetings of stockholders may be called only by the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer, or by a majority of our board of directors; requiring a classified board of directors, with 3 separate classes of directors each serving a 3 year term; requiring that only business brought before an annual meeting by our board of directors or by a stockholder who complies with the procedures set forth in the bylaws may be transacted at an annual meeting of stockholders; requiring advance notice of specified stockholder actions, such as the nomination of directors and stockholder proposals; and 36 Table of Contents authorizing the issuance of, without stockholder approval, up to 5,000,000 shares of preferred stock that could adversely affect the rights and powers of the holders of our common stock. In addition, we are subject to Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, which generally prohibits a Delaware corporation from engaging in any of a broad range of business combinations with an interested stockholder for a period of 3 years following the date on which the stockholder became an interested stockholder, unless such transactions are approved by such corporation board of directors. This provision could have the effect of delaying or preventing a change of control, whether or not it is desired by or beneficial to our stockholders. Future sales and issuances of our common stock or rights to purchase common stock, including pursuant to equity incentive plans, could result in additional dilution of the percentage ownership of our stockholders and could cause our stock price to fall. Sales of a substantial number of shares of our common stock in the public market or the perception that these sales might occur, could depress the market price of our common stock and could impair our ability to raise capital through the sale of additional equity securities. We are unable to predict the effect that sales may have on the prevailing market price of the common stock. To the extent we raise additional capital by issuing equity securities, including in a debt financing where we issue convertible notes or notes with warrants, our stockholders may experience substantial dilution. We may sell common stock in 1 or more transactions at prices and in a manner we determine from time to time. If we sell common stock in more than 1 transaction, existing stockholders may be materially diluted. In addition, new investors could gain rights superior to existing stockholders, such as liquidation and other preferences. We have stock options and warrants outstanding to purchase shares of our capital stock. Our stockholders will incur dilution upon exercise of any outstanding stock options or warrants. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. Not applicable.
